4. Add 2 T oil to the wok. When the oil starts to smoke, add first portion of the beef in an even layer. Let it sit until a forms a brown crust, about 2 minutes. With a spatula, flip the beef over to brown the other side, about 1 minute.
Los Angeles Dodgers
Soak potatoes in large bowl of cold water for 10 minutes. Tick or trim off any bruises with the tip of a sharp knife. Remove potatoes from water onto kitchen towel, covering them to dry.
The next morning, we looked out the door of our hotel to see the mountain being swallowed by the mist.
Straw, in theory, could have been in favour of the burka yet still admit to himself and others that they still made him feel uncomfortable. That’s possible. But that acceptance of the burka was not enough for Muslims and Engage (the Muslim group that’s kicked up a fuss about this) because Straw’s not banning the burka was not enough. They wanted more of his blood. They wanted him to change the way he thinks about Muslims. Thus they wanted to stop him feeling uncomfortable in the first place. They demanded that he actually thinks and feels as Muslims think and feel. They wanted him to ritually apologise for this affront to Islam itself. They wanted to rub his infidel face in the shit.
Khirad: Sara is dispensable. On a side note, she is an omen for all girls who devote themselves to their careers. They end up single, suicidal and even worse, single, suicidal and over 30. Its much better to be simple, chaste, poor, and pure.. But that is like stating the obvious.
“Knowledge rests not upon truth alone, but upon error also.” – Carl Jung
Here’s a closeup of the newly styled coffee table. Usually this table is jumble of Ben’s magazines and books and coin catalogues. It’s never nice and neat and styled. Today, I got him a basket to keep under the coffee table – for all his “very important reading materials” and hopefully I can keep the tabletop looking halfway decent from now on. I love the way the green apples look in the ironstone bowl. And the alabaster grapes are a favorite. My lacquer sewing box was the first “expensive” antique I bought years and years ago with money I had saved up for the HADA antiques show. For it’s entire life it’s been in the same place in the entry hall, but now I think it deserves a new home. The plates are French transferware.
So that was our experience at the Cottage Bakery. If you're interested in giving Cottage Bakery a try, it's located at 1382 Pembina Highway.
of counselors
Our CEO and Chief Creative Officer, Christophe Becker writes of the great merger between work and life, how the two components have become one. We no longer separate them, like our parents did and the men and women who beget them. Business or pleasure? Both. Case in point: I’m writing this post for peronal and professional reasons, each as important as the other:
Of course we think first of her race and name. In defense of the school district I did fill out a form that indicates I speak English, Scully speaks English and Spanish and Khubz speaks English with some receptive Spanish. So, in their defense, the word "Spanish" did appear on the language survey.
Last night we had Jever Pils and Affligem Blonde on draught. When I arrived there was still some Boon Kriek left, but it didn’t last long. Neither did the Schumacher Alt we replaced it with.
chicken tortilla soup with chipotle and lime (scroll down for the recipe)
Gandalf- Can You Travel In The Dark Alone
We made a little family trip to the zoo, well, a long time ago. I'm just finally getting to the pictures!
Hi everyone. Normally I'm not one for a big sales pitch, but when it comes to crafting yummies,bring it! If you're anything like me, you get really excited when companies release new goodies!! During CHA, I visit every blog I can to find about the latest and greatest stamps, inks, papers, tools and any other new yummies. I read the reviews, watch video demos, scour the blogosphere for pictures ... Yeah, you could say I'm a junkie. Just a little bit. One of these days I hope to actually visit CHA and witness all the exciting news first hand!
It worked. After several more years, Dr. Randall had created a super-bug, a retrovirus that contained the ability to alter a person's DNA so that they would be resistant disease. He had done it. But as Dr. Randall held the triumph in his shaking his hands, he finally looked up from his work and discovered that his daughter was now a stranger to him, and humanity was no longer worth saving.
B: It was a school day, I knew she was there. The first semester of the school year.
Primal
I see him out there a lot now, especially now that I know what to look for. And it’s usually on those foggy mornings.
Since this is the third time I've gotten otter photos, I am pleased.
Inks
“Sugar,” the voodoo priestess said after quickly leaning over close to Peter’s face, “just to let you know, you were terrible in bed. Peter’s consciousness evaporated to the sound of his ex-wife’s riotous laughter at his expense.
You held me
There is now a satellite system that produces an x-ray image of the Earth. The rays penetrate six feet into the Earth’s surface. Scientists exploring the Indus flood story considered that if this golden city ever existed, it might still exist under the ocean. So they mapped with x-rays the existing Indus River, and discovered its old river bed still imprinted on the ocean floor, tracing it another 150 feet into the ocean. When they explored that place off the coast they found an enormous city in two sections, perfectly intact, built of rock, 400 feet below the ocean. When the Noah’s Ark flood occurred, it occurred in such a way that it raised the level of the oceans 400 feet.
IVF's Barren Wasteland
How do you get unstuck, People of Blogland? Any tips you'd like to share when faced with the Blank Screen and no inspiration? Oh, and please - once you've filled in the Blank Screen and are ready to fix it, don't do this:
I forgive myself that I havent accepted and allowed myself to realize that the imagination of being hurt by another because it makes me feel good, is a thought that originates from me placing myself as inferior, not equal, and also creating an alternate reality in my mind, which is not the same as real life, where I do not feel good when I am really threatened by another.
I will mention a few ideas that may trigger your muse: A squeaking door, peeling carrots, internet access frustrations, misplacing your wallet, a power outage, running out of gas, a friend's visit, brewing coffee, going to the grocery store and forgetting to buy one of the things you needed, deciding to part with a pair of shoes you always loved, realizing that you threw away or lost something important to you.
taken from the back jacket of Beryl Markham's book)
Samantha Morton (actor- Synecdoche, New York, Mister Lonely)
Not yet;
Four New Orleans Saints players were suspended today for their involvement in the bounty scandal. Most significantly, Jonathan Vilma has been suspended for the entire 2012 season, effective immediately.
I’m a fully signed up member of the Kantian tradition. My reasons for this are that, against the deflationist tradition, I accept the need for a full-blooded explanation of these forms of normativity that explains their source (or their bindingness), but, against the Aristotelian tradition, I hold that it cannot be provided in metaphysical terms. As indicated above, I think that it is possible to provide an explanation of the deontic that explains it source without having to explain it in non-deontic terms. This is itself a Kantian approach, which proceeds in terms is of the notion of autonomy. On this account the force of obligations (their bindingness) derives from the way in which we bind ourselves to them (be it individually or collectively). This is a form of what is commonly called constructivism, which attempts to show how norms are instituted by (and thus forceful on the basis of) certain aspects of our behaviour. There are numerous things recommending this approach, but I think the simplest is that it uses the most minimal theoretical resources to achieve the greatest explanatory ambitions. This is amplified if, as I propose, those ambitions are expanded to include a complete explanation of the structure of rationality and of the remaining forms of normativity not already addressed.
I'll let you know how it goes.
Otherwise known as Pain Thy Name is Chiisai Tabata
1/2 tablespoon garlic powder
Such a wonder you've become
I still love Christmas. I love the time with family, the food, and, yes, the gifts; but it is different now. Now that time between Thanksgiving and Christmas is busy and full of stress. Now Christmas Eve and Christmas day are hectic as my husband and I try to fit time with both of our families in. The first few years of marriage it was not uncommon for us to get into a few arguments as we each wanted to hold on to our own family traditions.
3) I did mention I couldn't put it down, right? Because I just had to know what was going to happen. It's a fast, engaging read and one you won't want to stop reading until you're done. So make sure to set aside a good four hours (or whatever your reading speed happens to be) to finish this book.
Thursday – 3rd May – Ss. Philip and James
and the doors on the street are shut–when the sound of the grinding is low, and one rises up at the sound of a bird, and all the daughters of song are brought low–
On that day five years ago…that phrase takes me back to a time in high school when I was still desperately trying to handle this mind I was born with. I took a lot longer than most to mentally mature and I specifically took a very long time to master the recognizing the mechanics of my mind and gaging what I was capable of. In some cases when I was younger I would attempt to do things that were simply beyond me, yet I could never see that limitation before starting out. I would conceive these great ideas for a painting, or at least I thought they were great ideas, that was not only beyond my abilities but so esoteric and jumbled in concept that they would have been beyond even the greatest artist alive. It would be like jumping on a bicycle without training wheels without knowing how to ride a bike, and despite the fact that you were a paraplegic with one missing leg and one missing arm.
So, are you ready to let go? Are your ready to be loved into freedom?
Convalesced: am I?
Partial Mash Grains:
Matthew 28:8-9 "So the women hurried away from the tomb, afraid yet filled with joy, and ran to tell His disciples. Suddenly Jesus met them. 'Greetings,' He said. They came to Him, clasped his feet and worshiped Him."
Ziggy, the ultra-cool greyhound lit a cigarette then smiled at his three friends.
It seems that the lecturers’ leaders are worried that the formal partnership will damage the “university’s reputation”, sorry lads but LMU's reputation was damaged last week anyway wrt the alcohol and sex ban nonsense.
Bob: “Giant Snake picture, coming right up!”
but that doesn't diminish its value, because we are left with memories that we treasure for the rest of our lives.
It's now 5 after 10 and they haven't kicked anyone off. I'm sure the people at the local Fox affiliate WVAH are steaming. Serves them right for all those years that they pre-empted Idol for meaningless UK basketball games.
Sylvia Earle is an oceanographer who has led more than 60 expeditions worldwide and spent more than 7000 hours underwater in connection with her research. In 1990 she was appointed as Chief Scientist of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, the first woman to hold such a position. Today Dr. Earle is Explorer in Residence at the National Geographic Society. Recently she led the Google Ocean Advisory Council where she provided content and scientific oversight for the ocean components in Google Earth. LIFE IN THE OCEAN: THE STORY OF OCEANOGRAPHER SYLVIA EARLE, written and illustrated by Claire A. Nivola, introduces readers to Sylvia's early life, her passion for the ocean, and her work in ocean exploration and advocacy. The gorgeous illustrations showcase the wonders of the sea. Nivola's use of quotes from Earle nicely convey the spirit of this underwater explorer.
This awesome kit...
Took yet another bike to the Marais to... strangely, I didn't eat or drink anything in the Marais. Parked the bike.
SM Entertainment‘s new documentary film “I AM,” featuring the lives of artists like Kangta, BoA, DBSK, Super Junior, Girls Generation, SHINee, and f(x), cancelled its press premiere scheduled on April 30 without further notice. “I AM” was supposed to have its first premiere event for media and sponsoring companies on April 30 at 4PM. Although the press premiere of “I AM” has been cancelled, the showcase featuring SME’s artists still continued at 7PM on April 30.
But I was on there a near a minute and I reckon that’s enough.”
Well, guess what? Turns out that Americans, despite still having a LOT of work to do in the racism department, WERE ready for that change (hallelujah!). We as a country were a hell of a lot better than a lot of people gave us credit for. And I think that’s still true.
Last Thursday our new babyfaced consultant finally mentioned the amputation word.
Be sure to check the {TIDDLY INKS BLOG} to view the amazing projects from the Design Team today! Gorgeous, gorgeous. Stay tuned for MORE yummy goodness and another new image tomorrow! :)
different time zones, in day and at night. It will happen for millions
In a Hambulance!
Yesterday, I spent the morning watching three of four granddaughters for our girl, Kim. Kim is giving her oldest, Miss S-age 7, standardized tests for the homeschool group they are in.
I propose we stop this negative trait. Our home is rich in history, Americana and beauty. Despite the mix up in identity, let’s be proud of Missouri, the heart of USA.
So, yesterday, instead of resting like I was supposed to, we spent the entire day dealing with the cell phone company again, and buying a new battery. I finally installed the battery (barely, as I didn't have the correct tools, and really am ignorant enough that it wasn't really safe for me to be doing. Well, plus I'm not supposed to be lifting heavy objects...) at about 8pm last night. Only to find that the car still wouldn't start. It literally had no power at all. Jennifer came over for a movie, and she looked at it for me.... I had installed it correctly. It simply wasn't working.
I didn’t own griddle pan. I do now. Get ready for chargrilled everything.
What guided Rohaizad Mohamed, Senior Vice President of Broadcast Operations, in his split second decisions about what to cut out and censor and what to leave in? Is it just a “self-censorship” judgement call by the station as to what UMNO would be happy to see and what not? Or is there some list of key matters to abide by?
I have constantly been playing the game.
I would say that in most cases rain would actually encourage carp to start feeding, especially in the summer when it helps to oxygenate the water. The only reason rain may cause carp to stop feeding, is if the rain is consistently very heavy, or if it’s cold rain and causes the temperate of the water to drop. In this case, the fish could decide to move on to a different area of the lake which provides more warmth.
Those who might be affected:
For the devout High-Churchman, to whom the memory of Charles I., and the principles of hereditary loyalty and of absolute submission to the anointed sovereign as the divinely appointed head of Church and State, were scarcely less sacred than the Christian creed, to accept a Dutch Presbyterian as the head of the English Episcopal Church could not but be a very bitter hardship all the more so because of the memories of fanatical excesses and oppressions from which not a few loyal Churchmen had suffered during the Commonwealth, when Episcopacy was disallowed and a sort of latitudinarian Congregationalism, or else some form of continental Presbyterianism, was allowed precedence and privilege in the kingdom. Nevertheless, such Churchmen had found the tyranny of James II. a more intolerable yoke than even the rule of Cromwell, and the memories and records of the blind and cruel Popery of Philip and Mary had left behind for English Churchmen, a keener and stronger abhorrence ofPopery than their hatred of William s Dutch Presbyterianism. They now, moreover, saw that their only hope of deliverance form James’s tyranny and the domination of Romish cruelty and superstition, was to be found in the wise and able Prince who had married James s daughter, and who ruled over Holland. Such was the dilemma of the Non-Jurors. Their attitude of passive disloyalty may be understood, and in a sense sympathised with, but can hardly be regarded as wise, or tenable as a practical policy. Its unreasonableness savoured of superstition. The party numbered some exemplary saints and many estimable adherents, but practical wisdom can hardly be attributed to them. A fatal weakness infected the whole party, scholarly as not a few among them were, and wise within certain limits. That the Primate and six of his suffragan bishops, and no fewer than 400 of the clergy, were counted among them, are facts which show how strong was sectarian prejudice in the evil times of the Stuart dynasty. Their religious opinions may be summarily described as a combination of Laudian principles in Church and State with an intense abhorrence of Popery. They had good reason to abhor the Popery which had plotted against Queen Elizabeth, and excommunicated both the Queen and Realm of England. The Non-Jurors, moreover, besides the Laudian grounds of antipathy against Popery, had the recent experience of the Popish blindness and the contemptible character of James II. to deepen and make still more intense their Protestantism.
1/2 green bell pepper, chopped
At this early hour
It's easy to think you know what's happening, but important to make sure it actually could happen like that. So this is just a reminder not to be complacent about the lies you tell.
After I finish my first draft, which I continually rewrite as I go along, I'll do a hardcore second draft, trying to improve grammar and prose. Then I'll give it to a fellow writer to edit. Once I get their notes, I'll go back and do a third draft for a final polish.
Big doings also are happening for Pegasus, here with a happy tour group. Pegasus and Lehigh Valley 79 will be docked in Brooklyn Bridge Park starting later this week.
The second comment betrays a complete failure to grapple with what is "fair". I think it is fair that those who earn the money should keep it. His Grace has obviously not thought of that! Or maybe he is just too limited a thinker to grapple with it.
not only does Jesus come down from heaven, live without sin, dies for our sin, rises as our saviour, ascends into heaven, and He opens a doorway into the presence of God and the Kingdom of God and invites us to come through it, by trusting in Him. Jesus is exclusive. not all religions save, not all paths lead to eternal life, not all religions are true. there is no salvation and no forgiveness of sins, no reconciliation with God, apart from faith in Jesus Christ. Jesus is exclusive and inclusive. He invites us ALL. no matter what sin you’ve committed, Jesus invites you. no matter what race you are, Jesus invites you. no matter how old you are, jesus invites you. no matter what you’ve believed up to now, Jesus invites you. the door is open. one door. His name is Jesus Christ. everyone is welcome to pass through THAT door. all nations, all genders, all ages, all peoples.
When Freddie was only eight he went to a boarding school near Bombay, called St Peter’s School. He began to learn how to play the piano, was a member of the school choir, and was regularly involved in theatrical productions – no surprise there.
Andrew 02:12 minutes Theodora 02:10 minutes
This morning the Lib dem Ambassador in Wapping handed News International a final note stating that unless we heard from them by 11.00 a.m. that they were prepared at once to withdraw their offer to buy shares in BSkyB, a state of war would exist between us.
In the courtyard, a man in a Civil War uniform has been seen numerous times and has been mistaken several times as a reenactor. So real does he appear that tourists have even gone up to ask him questions; he politely refers them to the “nice ladies” inside the museum – ladies who have no idea who he is and can find no trace of him when they rush outside to see who the tourists are talking about. In the annex building, which houses an extensive collection of memorabilia on the second floor, heavy footsteps have been heard upstairs when no one is there, and the presence of a man believed to be a Confederate Major lurks in the downstairs office.
1 Berbatov = 94 minutes of inactivity, incorporating two minutes of mild interest.
It is my prayer that this book truly blesses those who read it. I have fallen in love with the women who are woven through the pages of the Word. Although these letters are fictionalized, I hope that the words these women have penned “from their hearts” touch yours, too.
Check out the Steet View image below and you can see how easily an unhip Tourist could be fooled – but now I have local knowledge…
According to Golden Era Gospel Blog, in 1996 Caravans alum Dorothy Norwood recorded a version of the Commodores' 1977 hit, "Brick House", for the soundtrack to the motion picture, My Fellow Americans. For sixteen years, this recording has been largely forgotten, until YouTube user gsj612 uploaded the song on April 26th. Since then, the recording has been shared across social networks and has gained a nice amount of views in that short period of time.
You can scale back the amount of parental assistance, but you get relatively more self-teaching and less education, and that is a decision you’d need to make based on the realities of your student, your family, and the other demands on your time.
So… Friday we managed to get the bookshelf shelves and closet shelves stained.
Some people think they should not give others a big head, so rather than being generous in their praise, they find fault with the work, no matter how outstanding it is. They believe that an inability to find fault may expose them as less than expert. They think it’s their duty to keep the artist grounded and to find something to criticize, so that the artist will improve. No it isn’t. What makes you the arbiter of taste anyway? Deliberately minimizing another person’s amazing achievements is as dishonest as lying about their work using excessive superlatives and oozing oleaginous platitudes.
5 help
Pod and I are recovering from Wonder Boy's 8th birthday, which was yesterday. (Believe me, last night I was too comatose to even try to blog). This was our first party where W.B. chose all the invitees--usually Pod and I slip in some grown-up friends with kids at or about his age. No such luck this time. We had about 40% kids from school, 40% kids he plays with outside of school, and 20% younger siblings and/or invited child's parent's new girlfriend's kids. The plan was to have a swimming party at my parent's house; unfortunately the sky had been rumbling all morning and about a half hour before the party was due to start, the skies opened up and the rain came down in buckets. I was sure that we would be stuck with 14 children in my parent's non kid-friendly home and was frantically trying to think up indoor games. (Crazy dancing? Duck duck goose? Musical chairs?) However, being Austin, the rain stopped 15 minutes later and by the time the first guest arrived you could hardly tell that it had rained at all. Except for the fact that it felt a little bit like a sauna outside. And the discovery that red, yellow, and blue streamers will dye pretty much anything they come in contact with if they get wet.
13.) The Nanny
and the grass needs mowing.
Master the art and science of network marketing and you can build your pathway to success. If fact, my goal here is to teach you some thing so new and revolutionary that will make you rich over-night.
Bendis, Brian Micahel and Mark Bagely. “Zodiac” Avengers Assemble. April, 2012. Marvel Comics
Amelia: Sheldon notices Amelia looks sickly and, more importantly, is hiding something from him. When he confronts her about drugs, she admits that she’s clean… and pregnant. (Congratulations to Caterina Scorsone on her real life pregnancy!) Based on her math (and ours), she approximately 20 weeks pregnant with Ryan’s baby. She didn’t realize it sooner, as her body was still detoxing. She’s unsure if she wants a baby, and also worried about what the drugs may have done to the baby. Sheldon wants her to talk to someone, anyone else, as he can’t deal with it. But, as Sheldon always does, he comes around and promises to be there for her in every way, except crib building. Do you think a romance is still in the cards for these two?
Q:I have developed a new product that is the fountain of youth. Can you tell me where I can sell it in Australia ? ( USA )
I’m working on a book that brings detail to a section of the October Country known as Snakewater Swamp. It’s been a lot of fun and is helping me to focus on certain systems I want to implement in the game and to flesh out the world in greater detail. I won’t say much more in the meantime.
This was a spontaneous buy. It's witty, it's purple...it's about cats. How could I resist?
The study, by the National Centre for Social and Economic Modelling at the University of Canberra and AMP, says it is ”bigger lifestyles” rather than higher costs that are exerting pressures on many households.
I have to learn to embrace those changes…
Wash, peel, cut the carrots and set aside until needed
To schedule a Chiropractic exam for your self or a loved one call 503-626-5761 and ask to see Dr. Pierce.
when they saw the look on my face.
Comments: Considered one of the first fully realized portrayals of a cybernetic consciousness. A new take on the Frankenstein motif. Much criticism has been done on this story, particularly in connection with Judith Butler‘s performance theory and Donna Haraway‘s cyborg theory. Criticism involving the portrayal of mass culture, which provides a backdrop for the story, is also available. This story has been highly praised and is considered by some to be one of the best sf stories of the 20th century. Read in Women of Wonder: Classic Years and The Best of C. L. Moore.
Being wrapped up in real love feels like nothing else. And you know it. New clothes, a good meal, a good movie……just……satisfy for a moment….and that’s all.
A diamond ring that her bf gave her sparkles in the light
Two small heads, one blonde and one ginger, poured over new colouring books, wisely supplied by their great-grandmother. The older child, just 4, was valiantly attempting to colour within the lines, while the 2-year-old scribbled wildly.
How far along? 38 weeks today!
Next, was the classic 6 mile Comb stage with steep ascents and decents invariably covered in snow; but yet again it was the enthusiastic duo who dominated the 1400 field and indeed making an impact on the event overall; setting 8th fastest time overall amongst four wheel drive World Rally Cars and 2 Litre turbo charged ‘Group N’ cars, a tremendous achievement in 1400cc 2 wheel drive car. This now opened up their advantage to 37 seconds at the head of the 1400 field after just 10 miles of competition, and with a further 22 seconds pulled from under his rivals feet in the 2 remaining stages of the mornig, the talented youngster would arrive in Penrith service halt with 4 seconds shy of a minutes lead;
Alyssa Silva – Associate Staff Writer
What We Do:
Yes, there is a story there and Zephaniah 3:17 is a big part of it. So much so that it is the topic of my next book, a journal account of the incredible journey we have been on since leaving our beloved Texas home, which I look forward to sharing more about in the coming days. This passage is so meaningful to us that we actually wrote it on the foundation of our new home before the builders finished out the basement this week.
So I need your input. We want to get the kids to actually read, so we are thinking something more popular (no more dry lists from 1983). Don't get me wrong, classics are great--but I know fifth grade minds pretty well by now and I know that the beach over a classic novel wins every time!
I was sitting in my living room watch my daughter pretend to be a horse galloping through the utmost difficult level of cross country course speeding above the times of her friends. She was chatting away and talking to herself and she was having a great time!
I am also working the neighbor’s horses too. They are pretty sweet. Ones an older mustang who’s in the twilight of his career and real big sweetie you can ride him around easy he also has pretty good ground manners. His best friend and pasture mate is a giant quarter horse who has to be at least 17 hands tall. And boy oh boy does he know it and he’s young too, a tad green around the edges. But very smart sometimes too smart for his own good but once you get the wiggles out of him he rides nice and has defiantly had some good western training in the past and once you get him into the work mode he has the most comfortable gaits. So I am pleased I have barely been riding them for a week and they are coming along good.
I was in an antique shop a few years ago and had a fun, “Walter mitty” type experience. I imagined I found the missing diary written by the childhood best friend of my hero, abe lincoln. then I saw it in my mind as a fun children’s book.
There’s something about home and human that cannot be separated– all humans seek home. And when that’s no longer possible? Read on– I asked my master, and he answered in verse:
Magic potion without a herb
The crazy thing about this record is how unbelievably awesome it is. Its generic in every sense of the word, but just thrash's through as though it was Jerry's Kids "my world". Seriously... this is a real under the radar, ignored, obscure tooth and chip thrash record that should be enjoyed by hardcore lovers worldwide. "what religion" , "pissed at the world" and "pro-liar" are tasty, catchy rippers that are the stand outs for me on this yummy platter.
“I asked Pippi to marry me.”
When I went to pick it up I heard some clunks and clinks.
I "repaired" the soles of the melted Sorel boots with Shoe Goo, but I don’t wear them for work because the Shoe Goo soles don’t work as well as an insulator as the original rubber plus there is no longer any tread on them and that makes them slippery to walk in. I keep them at home and wear them when shoveling the driveway.
Chris said head home. I will meet you there.
Further up the path, I meet a centaur whom appears to have an impressive amount of pubic hair, but it's actually the bushy end of his tail, strategically placed to ensure I didn't mistake him for a young boy. I'm sure they didn't think of these things when they were doing the art back in the '80s.
obviously, the threat is not certain. we are anticipating them. meaning none have been made, none that we know of anyway. but it still scares me.
You’d think that I, a woman who could not bear her own mother even before the onset of puberty, would understand the complexities involved.
Hal on the other hand doesn’t think he’s up to the task. A Green Lantern should be fearless and Hal has a lot of fear, quite frankly – mostly of failure. As a child, he watched his dad die in a plane crash before his eyes. Ever since, he’s been trying to live up to the legacy of a father who knew no fear and was the epitome of a hero. Hal is going to have to channel that kind of inner hero if he is to save the Earth.
The baklava was lots of fun. So much so, that I made two batches.
MOM: You know how many times I was sitting here doing just what you’re doing?
Designer Paper: Holiday Style from October Afternoon
I know that I'm often saying that "it's just a label" and "it doesn't change you as a person" but it's still extremely important to accept the label.
I asked Clermont if parents try to protect themselves from potential grief by staying more detached from their children. “I don’t think so. I think it’s still very hard for them,” she said, referring to the loss of a child.
... to already be stressed about the amount of work school is about to require for this next month.
- This is all corn.
03.Just Frosted Twisted Existence (04:34)
155. @SidMohede: Michael Jordan once said, “Talent wins games, but teamwork & intelligence wins championships.” Talent is NOT enough
1/4 cup of fish sauce
Hello Dreamers,
1 pound fresh meat, ground
Started to take my first steps to this goal. Had to run to Walmart and buy some shoes. When up there. I also walked by the sporting goods and looked around. Suckered myself into buying a S12 Heart Rate Monitor from Sportline. Once I figure out how it works, I will try and kick out a full review.
This is NOT intended to supplant or take over existing elected governments. If this Cabal were not so heavily woven into our society, these mass arrests would be much simpler to perform.
So how do you decide what activities or foods (or thoughts) are too dangerous to allow? How do you decide on your policies about limiting such things?
Hubbie worked today to fill in for another man on vacation this week so when he got home from work we made a trip to Sam's Club and then with clouds that looked like rain any minute we tilled and planted some old timey field corn in 3 rows at the back of our garden. It sprinkled a little just as we finished but then stopped when we came inside. We need some rain,maybe later tonight and tomorrow !
The article says:
Alternatively, a quick first glance at the genetics suggests that F3 and M57 could be closely related, even though he was first picked up in a field in Idaho, hundreds of miles from his current location. He and F3 share enough DNA to be father and daughter (unlikely, given that we suspect that they are roughly the same age), uncle and niece, or brother and sister. After his release in the Centennials, M57 made a pretty quick and decisive trip to his current location in the Absarokas – was he returning to known territory, a territory that he couldn’t previously occupy because his father was still resident? And if so, do wolverines have some sort of incest taboo that precludes mating with a close relative?
He turned that speech into an aggressive attack on the Bible, replete with multiple profanities, and into a promo for pleasures of proctological interest, with lascivious comments about his husband. 100 offended high school students walked out.
8 The Last Moment
Berenice Abbott (1 gelatin silver print, 1930/1950)
Van Nath described how male prisoners were whipped raw, their fingernails were yanked out, they were hogtied to wooden bars. Prison guards mutilated women’s genitals, ripped off their nipples with pliers. And worst of all, babies were ripped from their mothers’ arms and slaughtered.
that's just me.
At the same time, though, sociological adventure tourism opens up a fascinating range of future business models that we would do well to think about, and prepare for, before they come to pass.
What now? The wind is whistling through,
night began to grow old. and still the word, had not been received.
I was blessed to be born into a family who was firmly grounded in Jesus. They were wrong about many of their beliefs, but their basic foundation was solid. I have many wonderful memories of my childhood growing up with my sister. I also have many scars from my childhood that were inflicted by my parents and other adults in my life. I have many scars that were inflicted by others when I was a teenager and when I was in my early 20s. Even though I had a relationship with Jesus, it wasn’t the more mature and intimate relationship that we have now. Since I was indoctrinated to believe the same wrong things my parents believed, I had no idea what Jesus truly wanted from me, no idea how to give it to Him, no idea where I was supposed to be or what I was supposed to be doing. So I looked for love and fulfillment in all the wrong places, even though I had Him all along!! I was saved, but I was too blind to see and too ignorant to know the Truth when He was standing right before me the whole time.
I will list the general titles here and then each week get into them a little more and flesh them out for you. In brackets, next to each design step, I put the writing process step it most resembles. This might help some to better understand the designer.
Eg. Baby O is 6.7 kg, his min daily intake should be 670 ml, max 1005ml, in a 24 hour cycle. As I’m doing a mix of breast milk & formula, I find that the amount Baby O takes will tend towards max, usually exceeding by 200ml per day. However, during the 3rd month as I gave more formula, it was well within the stipulated intake.
The New York Times’ decision to disclose the Terrorist Finance Tracking Program, a robust and classified effort to map terrorist networks through the use of financial data, was irresponsible and harmful to the security of Americans and freedom-loving people worldwide. In choosing to expose this program, despite repeated pleas from high-level officials on both sides of the aisle, including myself, the Times undermined a highly successful counter-terrorism program and alerted terrorists to the methods and sources used to track their money trails.
Robin: 5:3. More witty than crass, but still a bada--.
There’s a look I get from some communities where singing is not the norm. It is a hostile, challenging look that says “no matter how hard you try you are not going to get us to sing with you”. This always disheartens me. I am happiest when I am not needed, that is, when everyone is singing so confidently and and enthusiastically that I can’t be heard over them.
On the contrary, those Christians who have allowed the Lord to work pearl into them, without becoming embittered, are precious in the kingdom of God. They emit the fragrance and beauty of Jesus Christ.”
Ditto for the question of whether "35% of each category shall have the status of journey level worker;" I didn't get an answer. But the Atlantic Yards web site reports all these goals as certainties, as noted in the screenshot at right.
Sauté the chopped shallot in the remaining butter. Add the mushrooms and sauté. Remove the mushrooms to the plate with the chicken and cover. Add the white wine and sauterne and reduce by at least half till it thickens. Add the demi-glace and warm. Add salt and pepper to taste.
“O.K.” I conceded, “it’s just a different kind of social life.”
Here is my top ten list of favorite movies to craft/write letters to:
But Chief Inspector Peter Mills claims that there is 'no specific terrorism issue that the town need have concerns about.'
Judging from his new music, Vasquez seems to have mellowed a bit. One thing that has not changed is Vasquez’s signature guitar tone and playing. You’d recognize it anywhere. Dave Crider of Estrus Records once called it “shit-o-phonic,” which seems about right. RV’s gravely, tortured howl is still intact too, still front-and-center. One of the things that’s so interesting about listening to Nice Smile is that, no matter how “modern” some of it is, most of it still sounds like Night Kings and Nights and Days. When the opening riff of “The Show” kicks in, it sounds like it could have been written by 1988 or 1992 Vasquez. Same with guitar on “My World” and “Dark Thud.” That’s because Rob builds his songs from timeless materials. Straight rock and roll does not age. Beneath the sonic adulterations of effects pedals, keyboards and buried, echoey Sic Alps type mixes — all of which I love – melody and mood also matter. Vasquez has always delivered those. If his new songs could be mistaken for “old” songs, it’s not because they’ve aged poorly or feel out of sync with the so-called times; it’s because they’re vintage. Timeless. As evergreen as “Strychnine.” Nice Smile proves that Vasquez hasn’t failed to evolve; he’s simply stayed true to his favorite sound, which is, at its heart — whether under the name garage, under whatever name you want — the sound of pure rock and roll.
Many Christians see the church world in black and white. You have liberals on one side–they are the bad guys who doubt the resurrection and don't believe in the Bible. And on the other side you have the good guys who believe in the miracles, do not waver on the deity of Christ, and want lost people to be saved. We call these folks evangelicals or conservatives or Bible-believing Christians. Give them a checklist of doctrines and they will get almost everything right.
It was the dream I never dreamt.
They didn't have the information about where she was taken at their fingertips because, as it turned out, this incident had actually happened a couple months before my visit. But they did give me the name and number of her conservator who told me where to find her, and expressed his appreciation that I was going to visit her.
However, there also are other, much stronger motives: South African dairy farmers are being murdered at a proportionally very high rate compared to the rest of the population.
The government formation journey could be far from over.
Simplified synthesis from multiple sources: Managers/Administrators mediate between money and people who do the work: teachers, principles, all those who make education happen. When managers hold the power, Money always wins, money determines, money makes the rules, sets the agenda, ceases to be a means to serve education, but comes to define what education is, and is for… namely… in the end, it all comes down to one thing: to make more money.
not realize there is a whole big world out there where many children, just like them, are going to bed hungry. When I say we won’t buy any video games but read books and play outside, my then six-year-old son says, “That’s OK, I have so many toys, many children don’t!” When middle schoolers use the word ‘gay’ derogatorily, my then sixth grader stands up to say, “Don’t say that, being gay is not bad or good, it is just a way of life!” And then they fight over something trivial like a piece of candy, or torment each other till I am ready to bang my head against the wall.
Someone asked me what was in the bags on hooks above my desks so this is a close up,i keep all my foam pads for my distress inks in a labeled bag so they are close to hand,yes i am that organised........lol
Continuing to nurse their largess, corruption, and pitiful decision-making is not the mark of patriotism– it is the mark of insanity, a la Albert Einstein (doing the same thing over and over again and expecting a different result).
Excellent read. As much as I enjoyed the first 2 books in this short story series, this one was even better.
Last week’s post gave a few examples of the first class of doubletalk. I could cite any number of examples of the second, but one that’s particularly relevant to the theme of this series of posts is that shibboleth of contemporary economics, free trade. That term’s become so thickly encrusted with handwaving and deliberate disinformation that it probably needs to be defined here; “a system of international exchange that prohibits governments from taxing or prohibiting the movement of goods, services, or money across borders” is as good a definition as any.
I haven't told her that I absolutely have to order a few hive frames this week or I cannot make the splits that need to be done. SHHHHHH No telling :)
But the fog is setting in.
Anyone who’s ever met me in person could probably understand why I sympathize with old bags.
What a cute name. iDubba. It actually caught my attention because my grandpa used to call the TV that Dabba (meaning that box)
After Big Idea, the animation studio he started in his basement, went bankrupt, Phil Vischer had an epiphany. He looked back and realized that while his immensely entertaining VeggieTales characters delighted kids and sold by the millions, they only taught children how to behave Christianly—they didn’t teach them Christianity.
Food: Tasty, cooked to perfection. There were a few options for vegetarians but the majority of the menu consisted of ‘Steaks’, Ribs and more meat!(Hence the name!)
I always had a weight problem but kept in total control by never eating white flour or sugar and ate only healthy natural fats. Around the age of 45 I started to go off my way of eating just a teeny wee bit here and there...a little sugar, a little flour, a little butter...and I knew I gained...but only 5 pounds that year. Within in a few years I saw that I was gaining at a rate of about 5-6 lbs a year. I went into DENIAL and stopped getting on the scale.
Beginning September 8, Tri-Community Adult Education's fall term begins offering all types of fitness classes.
IAG chief executive Willie Walsh said: “This deal provides a future for BMI Regional.”
Not only do BTC have an away kit, it also features their club crest. Their crest may only be the three letters that make up their name, but that in itself is an extra three or four pounds to the cost of a shirt. Such costs are something that most clubs in the Southampton League could do without, regardless of the fact that most don’t have a club crest anyway.
7. Timber Trail
A lot of these pieces are out of our price range, and a lot of them are just close to what we already have. so this is simply a mood board to give you (and my hubby) a feel for what I am thinking. I am really wanting to add in some more modern looks (i.e. curtains) to contrast and compliment the vintage (i.e. TV stand). We already have white and taupe incorporated into the room, so now I am looking to add charcoal gray and navy blue.
Heartsick with anxiety over her mother, lonely and unwanted, Ella is not a happy child. But as the days pass, she makes friends with the daughter of her grandmother's groundskeeper, Rosie, gradually learns how to get on with her grandmother, and thinks evil thoughts about a most unpleasant bibliovore who's come to admire the library. Still, she is bored and at loose ends.
This is a very easy recipe, made even easier for me by the fact that I never cook it. Dagny does. She doubles the recipe, which usually means leftovers. The first night we eat it on rice, and I like a sprinkle of salt. Out of the fridge, I like it rolled up in a tortilla and heated. (Although it's just as good over rice again, too.)
into bits like a glass bottle.
They’re a Minneapolis band being championed by almost everyone who’s anyone right now,touring with Bon Iver and having gigs completely sold out everywhere in the UK for good reason.
In plan view the box must be more than 200mm and less than 500mm from the cars centre line. So exhausts could not exit tightly placed along the cars centreline.
girdle the earth
So that's one comment telling me which print you'd like to win. An extra comment if you blog about it, and another one if you FB it, and yet another if you tweet it. You may leave up to 4 comments this way.
The only thing I changed was the filling. It was AMAZING people. Seriously, I love bananas and roasted bananas are even more awesome.
She kept our grandson in line and loved our son. What else could I have asked for. For this I will never forget her. She was a little spanish, mexican spit-fire I tell you. My son got his soul mate when he met her. They had over 18 years together before she died from cancer. I hate that word- cancer. It has taken people we love away from us darn too early.
Three kisses on two cheeks
These giants roamed around the streets close to the date of the 100 year anniversary of the Titanic sinking -tying in with some soppy story of course.
Alex: If you would like to provide feedback on a recent travel experience, use the form on this Web page. If you would like to contact United regarding future flight reservations, select the Contact Us link below. View Page
And after Tuesady? Even with at least one and maybe two wins, it doesn’t get any easier – Alaska, Georgia, Idaho, Massachusetts, N. Dakota, Ohio, Oklahoma, Tennessee, Vermont and Virgina.
Hello, everyone!
-You go to sleep around 9:30 p.m. and wake up at 7:00 a.m.!
As I read the first chapters of Healing is a Choice, a book I will review later, I had one of those moments of realization when I could see something from a differing perspective as if I were seeing if for the very first time. I was reading about how God always used people to bring about healing, that there was a connection between people for healing to occur. Throughout the book, thus far, connection is a key theme to all healing. I see this as an answer to a question that has plagued me for years.
Three needle bind off is often recommended for shoulder seams, but it can be used anywhere that two lines of live loops come together and require a sturdy seam to connect them.
each day how to care more. We discover that people
They are frightened at first by this, resistant, but come to appreciate the work they create together, and eventually win the Pulitzer Prize for Poetry.
Last year at a card show, I came across a table with a whole bunch of these ice cream sundae helmets. I scooped up what he had for the Cubs with no real plan for them although I've been slowly getting them autographed.
Bodyfat %:
1 calms
One Hot Pleasure (Dirtyloud Dub) Electronica 128 bpm 6:04
One of the best super hero films I have seen, fantastically well executed and deserving of the score I will give it.
She loves butterflies so I made an attempt to create a card including butterflies on it. The florals & butterflies are from my stash. I believe they're by Brenda Walton. The sentiment was computer generated using the lovely Edwardian Script font & then cut out with my trusty Nestie oval & scalloped oval die cuts. I used a Cuttlebug embossing folder called "Musical Flourish" & then distressed everything with DI "old paper". It has a hint of green in it that I just love. The green cardstock, pearls & ribbon are all from my stash. I used my FABulous Bow Easy to tie that sweet creamy bow.
c1 c3 c4
So prom season is totally coming up! And how better to celebrate prom season than by reading books about prom (especially since I am well out of prom age and I can't yet chaperone my kids' dances). Anyway, with prom in mind, I give you...
from the flowers of fragrant plants;
Zeus’s serial philandering (morally reprehensible, maybe) has given us both his immortal and demi-god children. Would I truly wish him to be a faithful husband, and thus be without, say, Aphrodite (no lovers or Trojan War stories, then) or Perseus (no Medusa tales) or Heracles (no Tasks)? Hera’s vindictiveness towards Zeus’s conquests (and to his offspring) is unpleasant—but can I say that, in the same situation, I might not have had a vengeful thought or two? Definitely no to both.
A pelican swoops at two bodies, veers off.
The most powerful commonly available chambering that fits into a "normal" sized revolver is generally considered to be the .454 casull; which is a .45 caliber round, at up to 400gr, and up to 1500feet per second for up to around 2000ftlbs of energy.
19. The last thing you did? botched
I'd say good as new but I believe this dog can never again be reduced to good as new.
final death throes of the Roman Empire.
Never mind, I've got the weekend to look forward to - tomorrow we are going out to with the kids as it's James' 10th birthday in the week... I know, how is it possible that I am the mother of a 10 year, old I hear you ask!! When I'm not even 25 :-D Yeah, right, I wish!!! Following that logic, I got married when I was 10... hmmm not going to wash anymore is it, LOL!
With a prayer for continued grace in the spreading and expression of the gospel in both Paul’s ministry and in the Thessalonians church, Paul turns his attention to one final detail. In light of all his comments concerning the end, Paul reminds them that the proper Christian practice is to work and not to become fatalistic. Paul refers them back to his conduct among them***
Mrs. Azevedo
Watch all parts if you have the time
Imagine a muslim scholar claiming islam is religion of peace then some one throwing at him the question, why allah has divided the months of the year in to sacred and nonsacred long before he created people ie months of peace and war? No matter whatever the answer one gets it will be some sort of funny answer showing allah, muhammad and muslims are foolish.
This is the final week to nominate your favorite site, forum, or podcast. Some nominees have received numerous (in one case over a hundred) nominations. Thanks in part to the new Facebook page we've had quite a good turnout. If you have a blog, please take a moment to mention the Awards. The primary goal of this effort is to bring a higher profile to the Eastern Churches and spotlight those sites that do so effectively. Though, I'm told, the prizes are also appreciated.
At first I kept going back to other blogs to see if I was doing mine "right". Isn't that just the most insecure stupid thing?! Although I'm constantly in a state of learning, I need to trust my own instincts. I've been hooking for years, I know what I like, and what works for me. So... I cut that out, and proceeded to hook my colors my way. I'm very happy with the results. I plan on crocheting the edge as suggested by Karen. I'm saving that job for a hook-in this weekend. I find that the border project will involve a lot less hooking paraphernalia to be dragged along.
Today the average African earns less than they did 50 years ago, when still living under under alleged their cruel white oppressors, life expectancy is plummeting (not only due to AIDS) their infrastructure is crumbling around them, and as we have seen recently in Kenya, tribal violence, which, apart from a brief reappearance during the Mau Mau outrages of the 1950's (long portrayed by our media a a liberation struggle but essentially tribal), had been long suppressed is making a reappearance.
Please take time to read the March submissions by the other carnival participants:
He was also a walking paradox: a banker by day and a raving punk rock & wrestling fan at night, defying any & all conventions on the right, left, & outside centre. A Sun TV commentator wouldn't be able to reconcile his on-going support of the arts (especially punk rock!) with his position, and neither could a Rabble writer. Both would be reduced to apoplectic fits in his presence.
I am a big fan of Bacon, Lettuce and Tomato sandwiches, less the lettuce, as I am not a big fan of lettuce on my warm sandwhiches. I got this recipe last week and I decided to try it out last night from Cuisine at Home and decided to test out for Jake and Lani.
The episode will air on MBC on May 3.
I have a new card to show you today... This is a second card which I've made as a GD for The Stamp Basket online shop. I've used a new Suzie Ponders stamp from Sarah Kay, colored her with Copic markers. My papers are "Nature Garden" from new Prima collection.
The truth is that while it is my training, it is the process and the tactile quality that I love. The sensation of stroking the marker across the page. Watching the image take dimension and shape. The art of rendering for me is almost like a ritual; sitting down with a drink in my studio, music playing, I select my colors, laying them out in order, take a moment to ponder my light source and then start. I find that my best work, comes when I'm relaxed, in the moment and not thinking too much. You can't rush rendering by hand. You have to go slow.
"Did I dream that, or did I just meet Barney Harwood?"
There is a lot too this whole thought process of David saying positive things about Saul. Imagine David not saying anything bad about Saul after everything, the running for is life for over 10 years. How can he do this? David seems to have already dealt with Saul’s sins against him by forgiving him. This is what seems to have freed Joseph to deal kindly with his brothers, in spite of their wicked actions toward him. I believe David has forgiven Saul, therefore he has no bitterness to suppress or to vent. It is a sad thing to harbor bitterness, because of the harm that it does to us. David does not have to dredge up the past because he keeps short accounts. Do you keep short accounts with people or are you living in bitterness? Bitterness is like drinking poison and expecting the other person to die. Bitterness harms you!
Dawdling by the Danube: With Journeys in Bavaria and Poland
There are polite, professional, respectful ways to disagree with an award . . . and then there's this.
1-Vinsettie
One night I was telling him something I was excited about. He interrupted me saying you didn't tell me that before. Only I had. Again I felt accused of something I hadn't done. It was a misunderstanding. I told him I didn't feel like telling him anymore. The mood was just gone for me. And do you know what he did?
Anyway, onto the pizza! So the big debate is New York thin crust or Chicago deep dish. Now personally I have loved thin crust pizza since I was 6 and first had true thin crust pizza in New York. I even fold my pizza, which my friends and family make fun of me for. I actually have been doing that for my entire life, and to my knowledge, have never seen anyone else do that. I didn’t learn that was a New York thing to do until I was in 7th grade. Well, I had deep dish pizza for the first time when I was in Chicago, at a place called Gino’s. It was really good. The crust is made with cornmeal, and is a bit sweet. I had black olives and spinach on my pizza. One slice, on a small pizza, is huge. It is way more filling than thin crust. My verdict? If you like the brick oven taste, New York pizza, all the way. If you want more of a meal, deep dish – I mean, it’s like a hearty serving of cheese lasagna really. Honestly, I like both. But, I think my mouth naturally waters for a thin crust pizza. Maybe because I have eaten more of it, or maybe it’s that perfectly burnt, crisp taste of the crust… I’m hungry now…
There is no such thing as thought leadership. There are thoughts, ideas, concepts, and provocations. Some people have them and share them. They are called "thinkers." If others join in and build on those thoughts, well then, by golly, you are probably having a conversation. Here's to a 2012 without thought leadership.
Spread the raspberry jam on the bottom of the pastry you have just baked.
And you go crazy. Thousands of results, thousands of approaches. You find out that the cover letter is even more important than the story you’re submitting. That if the cover letter is not like this and like that and doesn’t include a, b and c, nobody will look at your work. That you would be a fool not doing this and that when you send your story.
Father of the Chapel, Jonathan Lovett, said: “It just shows that striking can be a positive action if the cause is right. We feel we have finally found a voice after months of fruitless negotiations and frustration.
Sometimes you have to look in the mirror and say who’s my neighbor? Go through your phone and say Who’s My NEIGHBOR? When you pray say Who’s My NEIGHBOR?
just yet.
Tomorrow is the autumnal equinox, and Mabon, for the Wiccan. A day of giving thanks and celebrating the bounty of the year. A day for balance and shifting toward winter and 'rest.'
Ink: Memento tuxedo black (Tsukineko), Distress Ink shabby shutters (Ranger), Copic markers
But it will be the Olympics. In London. The top sportsmen and women of the world will be there, fighting for ultimate glory. I find it hard to believe that people get more excited about Celebrity Big Brother than the Olympics. You can guarantee the French wouldn't have been so negative about the whole thing.
So today, Ashlyn, one of my closest friends, freed me from everlasting boredom by letting me borrow some books. ^-^ Said mangas are volumes 1&2 of Monkey High and volumes 1&2 of Sand Chronicles. I have no idea whatsoever what these are about, so.. It should be fun? :3
Gypsum prices generally track demand. As the chart below shows, the gypsum price index, (a component of the producer price index), has by and large moved in line with construction spending over the past 20 years.
For starters, I got stalled on my WIP again. After starting this novel with so much promise and writing like my fingers were on fire, planning for months, and dissecting my first book until I knew every little thing I did wrong, I still couldn't see the forest for the trees in my second attempt. Now, halfway through, I've discovered my plots are too thin and I can't carry them through to the end because I have no idea where I'm going.
The only notification you’ll receive is the winner post on this blog. So be sure to check back a week from Saturday to see if you won. You will have 4 weeks from the posting of the winners to claim your book.
“As a rule of thumb, try to include foods in your diet that have less than three grams of fat per serving. Stock foods in your refrigerator that you want to have on your diet. If it’s not right in front of you, you’re less likely to eat it. Cleaning out your refrigerator can be a nice metaphor for cleaning out your body and organizing your life in the way that you want it to be,” advises Dean Ornish, MD. “Even simple choices can make a powerful difference. For example, two tablespoons of most salad dressings have as much fat as two scoops of premium ice cream. When in a restaurant, ask for the dressing on the side; just dip the tips of your fork in it with each bite, and you’ll get a fraction of the fat that you would otherwise.”
(Which is either a really, really CLEVER play on words...or just wrong. And I'm pretty sure it's wrong.)
Even with our guidebook it was difficult to find our way out of Gyor and onto the bike path. A nice man gave us directions but people like him often think in terms of vehicles, as he did, and we ended up on a busy road. Finally we found what appeared to be the path and we followed it only to end up pedaling on a dirt road through the woods, actually more jungle than woods, with no idea where we were. It had to be the right direction , we thought, so we just kept on and finally got on the road to Komarom.
When used to treat SAD or other forms of depression, light therapy has several advantages over prescription antidepressants. Light therapy tends to work faster than medications, alleviating depressive symptoms within two to 14 days after beginning light therapy as opposed to an average of four to six weeks with medication.
Also at the HAI weekend, I felt moved to offer spiritual healing, and did what I felt moved to do, offering at the solar plexus chakra, the seat of power. This makes no intellectual sense to me, indeed my inner rationalist could easily produce the arguments to refute it- but it felt real, and right, and my inner rationalist does not feel, itself, any need to produce that refutation. The person felt something.
to ask all the questions I have.
How much better had we simply clasped a hand, laid an arm across a shoulder, and given a comforting pressure. The grieving one would have known how we felt and would not have had to listen to our rush of inadequate words – would not have had to try to answer when there was no answer.
Some women enough once walk down the street, to remain in the memory of man forever.
“Well, I would prefer you naked than like this.”
She was friendly and considerate to all associated with her. She would banter with her WSOs (woman security officers) and correct their English grammar and pronunciation in a friendly and cheerful way. Her former WSOs visited her when she was at NNI (National Neuroscience Institute). I thank them all.
On the left side in particular, the brain damage is right where the ventricles near the stem which in all kids is their motor function location. Any other spots of brain damage that were found were too diffuse to pin to any other cognitive, motor or behavioural delay. And it was these spots (more than those of obvious motor function) that Avery will most likely be able to "re-map" since a child's brain is so much more elastic than an adult's.
-earth balance
The layers of denial run so deep that it’s important to try to be clear where we can. First, it is an insult to Hindus, Sikhs and decent, integrated Muslims to classify those brutes under the catch-all title of “Asian males”. All but one are Pakistani Muslims who come from a patriarchal peasant culture that obviously regards young white British girls as easy meat. Those children were considered fair game for degrading sexual acts on an almost industrial scale. The men took a calculated gamble that no one gave a damn about the girls. And you know the worst thing? They were right.
Years ago, I loved watching pro-wrestling. Not for the action but for the sheer beauty of the insults hurled at the combatants. My favorite kind of match was the "Loser Leaves Town." Win, you get to stay in front of the home town fans. Lose, off you go to Boring, Oregon. (Yes, there is such a place)
On my way home I stopped in Ft. Myers to see my old friend Jack, who always offers supportive wisdom and the occasional swift kick. Interestingly, Jack and Tony independently pushed me to consider that the time has come for me to write a book. Talking with them about this pushed me past the subject of my cancer for the first time in a long time.
Right: Henry V
It seems, despite Joab’s treachery and propensity to violence, even in peace time, David deemed him useful to keep alive (or dangerous to kill). As Franklin D. Roosevelt was much later reputed to have said of Nicaraguan dictator Anastasio Somoza, “He may be a son of a bitch, but he’s our son of a bitch.” Joab traded ethics for expediency and integrity for power. His loyalty to David, it seems based on his behavior toward the end of David’s life, was rooted in an effort to secure his own position within the kingdom, rather than selfless service for his king.
I feel that I have a lot more reading and research to do on the topic, but I don’t mind, because I’m starting to really love food policy and related issues; to me it’s incredibly important to understand what we’re putting in our bodies, especially when we feed ourselves multiple times a day. In the meantime, below are just a few articles on the topic to get started. Please feel free to comment back; I’d love to hear what other people have to say on this topic!
However, I'm determined to get better by the end of the week, so hopefully I'll have lots in store for you next week to make up for my neglect, so just be patient with me! I'm still here and I still care!
Peg Leg used to nest in the bulrushes beneath this pullout. All went well until one morning we drove past and noticed a golden eagle was standing on the nest site and eating her mate! The next year she had a new mate.
“… and there is a lot more hitting, hurting, thumping etc in the classroom for no particular reason.”
On April 29, 2012, the news lab test results failed to find a virus as the cause of the dolphin deaths.
Best wishes….
In a nutshell: good, loyal, honest Uncle Tom (George Lee Miles) a recent Christian convert and a slave so trusted that he is the actual manager of his master’s farm, is sold off to pay some debts. Fortunately he winds up at the home of Augustine St. Clare (Rick Delaney) an owner even kindlier than his previous one, and made the personal servant of his saintly daughter Eva (Helen Highfield). Unfortunately, St. Clare dies before he is able to free Tom as he intends to do, and Tom is sold at last to the villainous Simon Legree (Dan Snow), who eventually whips him to death when he refuses to beat his fellow slaves as instructed. Along the way, there are strong, memorable sub-plots, including Eliza (Marcie Henderson’s) escape across the river ice (a favorite incident with silent film producers), and the rehabilitation of the “wicked” pickaninny Topsy (Alex Marshall-Brown) by St. Clare’s Yankee cousin Ophelia (Lisa Riegel).
And that this specific type of landscape – the golf course – is then exported, repeated, and cloned, via bulldozer, in decidedly non-glacial landscapes all over the world, from the urban cores of Chinese cities to American military bases in Afghanistan, only adds to the fascination.
I remember the first time I herd of Equal Money. I was in the Kitchen on the Desteni Farm and it was Bernard who mentioned the point to me. I had initially gone for a visit to the Desteni Farm based on the Material I had researched and the interactions I had with those involved with Desteni at the time. I understood that I was getting acquainted with a “life changing” process, though this process of change was not yet mentioned at all within the context of an Equal Money System. I was there on the farm interested in learning more about myself and how to “change” and to learn more about this process of equality and realizing ourselves as life.
Mastered By - Eric Spitzer-Marlyn , Othmar Eichinger
This option would be a little more flexible with my hectic schedule, for now.
Column 1-- Earnings -- these are the ings the kids can do to earn the bucks
If you have been learning your guidepost stars as they rise in the East, you won’t be surprised by the two bright stars which flank – and outshine – our pole star in May. To the northwest is Capella, a star we first met when it rose in the northeast in November. In May the northeast is dominated by a star that is almost Capella’s twin in brightness, Vega, a guidepost star we introduce in May. (See “Look East!” for more about Vega.) As a bonus we also have the twin guidepost stars, Castor and Pollux, coming into view high above Capella, as we face north. But let’s focus on Capella and Vega.
For Grungy Monday we went back in time to 2009 day 3 of the 12 tags of Christmas by Tim Holtz, and this time the technique was to create a plaid pattern with alcohol inks. I didn't use Glossy Cardstock but I used Glossy Photo paper that you can use for the laserprinter. It works just as good with the techniques that I've tried it so far, and is much more affordable :).
The Lord has sustained me in all sorts of situations where I consciously refrain from turning into the food for my life~all those things food can be that brink on the negativity to destroy me. FOOD MUST stay in it's rightful place in my life...and I don't tolerate it rearing up it's ugly head to try to move into more prominence. NO WAY! I refuse to allow people or events to change what's working...no tossing about like a ship tossed in a storm...I believe with God's help, I must stay firmly affixed to the task of making sure that I am nourished properly each and every time...no changes here, for me.
-You have such a goofy cheese smile
It’s a difficult balance to attain.
What is your all time favorite band (besides us)?
Here in California we have a similar problem, uncontrolled spending. The Democrats created a fake budget and then express amazement when the tax revenues do not roll into fill their budget fantasy. California’s economy is in the tank. Democrats are totally in charge, and California’s economic failure is the Republican fault? Only in a Democratic Potemkin village.
I had planned to concentrate on form today, but because I was uncomfortable I ended up just slugging through 4.3 miles.
She never again visited her husband; and Hachiyemon gradually recovered his health and strength. But whether he always kept his promise, the Japanese story-teller does not say.
Goodbye for now.
7. The House of the Ego - Cavalier 3 parts Sep 20, 27, Oct 4
Nominations close on 30 May 2011. ActionAid will then choose a shortlist based on the quality of your nominations and provide an easy video challenge for each of the shortlisted nominees to complete. Based on the results of this challenges we’ll be choosing our Hunger Busting Blogger and flying them off to Tanzania in July.
Then Equestrian got up to shut her door and peeked down the hall. The girl was just sitting on the floor, in the dark, facing the other way, with her legs splayed out in front of her.
Well, why then, as ‘Deckboss‘ reports, would the State of Alaska be spending over $15 million on hatchery equipment and (‘gasp‘) NET PENS?
Anti-Tobacco proponents however will routinely count those 10 years as the new holy grail of intangible proof of tobacco’s alleged toll on society and claim them as “lost productivity” as if we are all simply cogs in the machine specifically designed to keep them in business. Anti-Tobacco is an industry now after all.
but I wanted to acknowledge this blogging birthday and say again how much pleasure and enjoyment working on this blog has brought me. besides being a constant source of inspiration and knowledge, the blogging community is also made up of so many lovely people. there are way too many people to name (I honestly wish I could, but maybe a scan through the links list would do just as well!) but I've come into contact with so many wonderful people and even met one of my best friends.
Thus far, we have around 100 signatures. Given that we have a regular subscription list of over 1500 members (representing patent attorneys, inhouse counsels, NGO's, students, government folks and other members of the public interested in the IP system), it is a pity that we have only 100 signatures.
Librarians? Aren’t they supposed to be bespectacled women with a love of classic books and a perpetual annoyance with talkative patrons — the ultimate humorless shushers?Yes! or ... I don't know, maybe?! No?? Why are you asking me about librarians again? Aren't they people just like you and me? What are these silly questions? Is this the NY Times? I thought I was reading the NY Times. Can someone please point me to the NY Times.
Each Tower Hours is different and the rewards can be absolutely anything, but you won’t know unless you’re there, so don’t miss it!
The letter invites the Ministry of Finance to send the documents in 10 days or we go to the High Court.
When my oldest child was in school she decided she wanted to participate because the school was making a big deal about the prize the kids would get at the end of the week. We told her that we'd support her in participating but her sisters were very little and weren't going to participate, and there were two shows that the adults wanted to watch after she went to bed during that week. At the end of the week she got her prize, which turned out to be just a sticker. She was not impressed by the sticker and that was the last time we gave into the hype around Screen Free Week.
C. Chore that you hate: Hanging clothes out to dry. Ugh.
The lucky winner of last weeks challenge is:
5) Central Park is a God-send: I got to spend a few hours in Central Park, exploring while jogging around the park. For those runners (or not) who have never been, it’s a must-do. There is so much within the park, especially if you have kids or like outdoor activities. And it’s all free! I could have stayed there all day, both days. Stupid work gets in the way!
In all of these assessments, I have found myself growing in the strength of who I am, instead of the weakness of who I am. I have chosen to not give up anymore of myself, as I had in the past. I no longer blame others for what I feel has been taken from me... instead, acknowledge that I have freely given away aspects of myself... and, if I feel that I can no longer give those things away, without losing important parts of myself, that I need to hang onto, then, I will move on, and not leave destruction in the wake of my path. In the past, I would end up writhing about, fighting as if trying to escape some pain that someone else had induced onto me... when, in fact, I was only trying to escape my own self and the predicament that I had mistakenly brought myself into, out of weakness and ignorance. One could owe all of these weak moments and bad decisions to the fact that my choices were born of low self-esteem from early on. Now, to change those things.
1/2 tsp crushed red pepper flakes
Sent: Sunday, March 25, 2012 5:46 PM
“In fact,” she said after a while, “we have gone into hibernation. nobody can get in any longer and no one can get out!”
I don’t know anything, really. What I do know is that my house is a mess and there are huge piles of laundry waiting to be washed and bills that need to be paid and I feel like a little girl. That’s real, and the uncertainty and fear are more real than a lot of things right now.
St Jean Vianney, whose holy heart, excitingly, is coming to the United Kingdom, was apparently very against dances in Ars. In fact, part of the success of the holy priest was that he managed to get people, through his holy example, penance and prayer, to stop dancing, frolicking, cavorting and getting smashed and to adore the Living God instead, to tend to their souls, be holy, go to Confession and live for God.
The Outside World wasn't kind to Prilla. Prilla quickly discovered that the Outside World didn't value the qualities of oddness and uniqueness like the Confederacy. Her unique dress and flamboyant attitude toward science education was laughed at by many and feared by some. The principal of her school, after meeting with a parent's committee, dismissed her.
Spare has been my co-leader for the past three years. But next May she will be in finals week ... college. Wouldn't be right to continue without her.
If he chose that nickname for himself, then good for him. If he had it chosen for him, then I would suggest applying for a new nickname. Not sure if here in Peru it is a good thing or a bad thing to be named after a slow di-chromatic ursine animal that feeds on bamboo.
Mumsnet in particular, seems to have a clutch of angry people foaming inwardly with impotent rage, but it’s by no means the only one. (Just the most high profile).
While The Atlantic's proposal as given is bad--subsidizing gasoline strikes me as intelligent as subsidizing cigarettes--it wasn't meant to be taken seriously. (Or at least that's what I'm assuming, graciously giving the editors there the benefit of the doubt). But on the other hand...
As you strengthen your heart this helps you to have greater clarity and awareness about any situation you find yourself in. Your heart gives you new insights, perspectives and attitudes about efficiently managing whatever challenges come up in daily life.
Jimi appears onstage at two shows with Phish at Radio City Music Hall. They cover the Motown classic “Take Me To The River” and Nirvana’s “In Bloom.”
Blend in blender and enjoy!
8. Black ankle boots (Clarks)
The #CTWW Gang are those folks who share our challenges on twitter using the hashtag #CTWW. If you're a Twitter member, I highly recommend following them ... they have a lot of great things to say. Let's meet them:
04 - I'll wait (4 minutes of soul) (4:21)
Hodad's is one of those secrets that you wish nobody else knew about, but since Guy Fieri blew their cover on his Food Network show "The Best Thing I Ever Ate," I figured I had the go ahead. I mean, the line to get in stretches around the block most days.
For the glory of the skies,
It's only the second time I've ever been to the London Book Fair. I went once decades ago under the impression I'd been asked to do an event. It was chaotic, with no-one expecting me and I found the whole experience daunting, exhausting and off-putting. And that was when I still lived in London, too.
Anyway, next up is Easter recap and an awesome review!!!
Flowing down to Camelot.
However, it has been revealed that there is another RM97 billion loans guaranteed as public debts which are unaccounted by the federal government. To add this RM97 billion would have pushed our national debts to 62% of our GDP, well above the 55% which is allowed by our laws. And our actual per capita debt should have been more than RM20,000.00.
As i pore through these verses, many are evoking within me deep abstract thoughts, emotion and memories of personal experiences that have mirrored the feelings, insights and sensations of the heights of human experience and perception described in the verses. Such is the effect of contemplating and reveling in the enchanting words of these ecstatic poets. No doubt that I will return time and again to this book’s pages for further inspiration.
* You’ve written several books under your own name and as Gabriella Poole, how long on average do you take to write a book and do you ever have more than one project on the go? If you do have more than one project how do you divide your time?
Well I don’t have to come up with the answer right now. It will only become an issue when I go to publish something. So I have some time to think about it.
Well, that should have kept you busy a while, so I'll say ciao for now, don't forget to mark the Santa Sack Swap in your diary, and if you miss out, don't be blaming me, I've made sure you know where it's at, when it's at and have even put the button up on my side bar, should this post get buried under new posts before the 15th.
Supplies: (all PTI unless noted)
This is the basic recipe for beer bread. I always use a beer that has great flavor. Remember, whichever you use is what you will taste. Bell’s Brewery (from Michigan) just released their seasonal Oberon beer, so I had to use it! Has an orange taste.
Brighton BN1 4AL
Speaking of support, I want to congratulate Traci on her new book! If you're interested you should check out the amazon link on her site. So head on over, see what she's doing today and look at her awesome new book!
God has placed a desire in my heart that no one else has ever been able to take away from me. He gave me a true gift when He gave me hope. It has allowed me to open my heart to the love of a wonderful man and finally experience an authentic relationship. Hope has given me back my daughter and completely restored my relationship with her. Now I share my life with my daughter two beautiful granddaughters.
Here’s the 1960 Joan Baez version. Her version uses a subset of the Georgia Turner lyrics.
Nothing can beat, when you start riding on ghats with one eye on road and second on beautiful landscape.
In fact, all of my favorite old movies weren't on the shelf. Correction: there are exactly two of my favorite old movies on the shelf...Roman Holiday, and Casablanca.
With the insane thunderstorm systems going through last night, our front tree must have been shaken a lot. Dh woke up this morning to find a bird's nest fallen from the tree! I'm pretty sure it's a new nest, which makes it sad to see; all that work ended in a flash. (No pun intended!)
Anyway - hopepfully this year I'll do better with blogging. I'll keep you updated on the kids (and I don't mean FOS and FYS, although they are doing well also.)
I often go to her shop and drool.
For they’d like to heel it over to their laughter when it lists,
From the Imperial Media Department
Thank heavens for peonies.
All Shells were stamped with these steps:
The dramatic moments of an unforgettable season have been broadcast around the world
Thanks so much for stopping by. Have a great night...and don't forget...tomorrow's St. Patrick's Day...so wear something green!! :-) Pat
I thought that that was exactly what was happening in Italy, so all the tourists coming to Italy for the first time could taste already an example of how women are represented in the country.
However, they showed that the omega-3 fatty acids EPA and DPA, showed little effect in reducing the risk.
+Today I volunteered for ELLE's Style 360 at Studio 37! The shows they held today were bebe, WALTER, and Clandestrine Industries by Pete Wentz. While WALTER may have been the only clothes I would have worn, the experience was great! I did the same setup and run errands work again, but I got to see the last two shows, and I even got to sit second row for WALTER, behind Kelly from NYC Prep. I also saw Kim Kardashian, Ashlee Simpson and Pete Wentz. Ashlee Simpson has the skinniest legs ever! It was a long day, but so much fun!
100 gr all-purpose flour
I also save animals fictionally. In real life, I help to save them by volunteering at a private pet shelter.
I said that all was OK, as I picked up my shirt, inspecting it before redressing myself. I decided that I would start with the outside surface. I hummed to myself as I washed the top and side boards. I believed that I was doing a great job. Then I stood back to admire my expert cleaning abilities only to discover that the stainless had swathes of sponge marks streaking from left to right and up and down! It was then that I realized that I needed a heavy duty cleaning solution and that I needed to follow the sponge directly with a towel. Into the house I went in search of reinforcements.
...Merry Christmas!
2. Technology Platform:
It was Labour which ultimately delivered the New Sheppey Crossing and the new hospital on Sheppey and funded the children’s centres now under threat from David Cameron and Nick Clegg’s cuts.
Sound New Age and touchie feelie? I don’t think so. It’s an act of faith for both leaders and followers to trust God with leadership – to trust the Maker.
Kasper Well Prime Minister we have a guest from the English Civil Service on a study visit this week – Steve Quartermain their Chief Planner.
I have been craving a bagel with lox and cream cheese for almost my whole pregnancy and have been looking for a Jewish deli for a while to see if they had it on their menu. Jesse does not like like lox, but recently one of his co-workers (who is Jewish) gave him the name of a Jewish deli here in town. I was really excited when he told me and I have been trying to convince Jesse for us to go there (so at least I can order something Jewish!....
No wonder he's smiling. I'd be laughing in his shoes.
5. Your Wildest Dream
While some members of the financial elite say they are willing to pay higher taxes, they note the picture for Wall Street firms is not as sunny as some on Main Street might paint it. Wall Street banks already are beginning to shed jobs, and consulting firm Johnson Associates Inc. is predicting bonuses for those who remain will shrink by 20 percent to 30 percent.
Every little thing
11. As a kid, I was allergic to most fresh fruits and vegetables. My reaction was just an itchy throat so it wasn't HORRIBLE, but it definitely made for an excellent excuse not to eat them.
You know what? Doing all I do while trying to deal with my own issues, it’s a lonely, tiring battle sometimes. I might seem fine on the outside, but quite often I’m not. I keep smiling because that’s what I’m supposed to do. And because I want more than anything for people to think I’m fine. And I usually am compared to how I used to be, but quite often I’m not, and it’s lonely, tiring and quite simply outright draining.
2. Even on her writer's blog The Bitch tries to stick to professional matters, though she knows she's not successful, and anyway being professional means using images etc in just the way she critiques here.
And though I've tried to break away
Concerns over economic constraints and distance from facilities are no doubt limiting factors, but this conclusion takes away the agency and responsibility of Ethiopian women. If the clinic-based care was an attractive option for women and perceived as a necessity, it would compete more evenly with the home-based model of birth that women overall prefer. Home births in Ethiopia vary vastly by region, from husbands and wives squatting together, to groups of women invoking the Virgin Mary in collective prayer at the parturient’s home. These types of interventions and models of birth are left out of the clinic. And, even though they are low-technology and cost-free, they are never included in the medical mode of delivery. But these are the interventions that women seek after for whilst vulnerable in the sways of birth pains.
Brand New Key by Melanie
Even if your faith is as slender as a spider’s thread, you can still trust in Jesus. It is the object of your faith that matters more than the amount of your faith. His refuge is not just reserved for the robust of faith. It is especially available to those of us who are flailing away in faithless fear. We have lost our way and we need to get to a wise weigh station to evaluate our faith. It is in refuge with Him that we are blessed with clarity and conviction. God is our refuge and God is our strength. He is a very present help in trouble. Therefore, we will not fear, but will believe that the very best is found by faith in Him. Hope exists.
And I'm not writing this as a critique,
- Not Sindalf’s script
Soni Sori, 35, is an adivasi school teacher from Dantewada who was arrested in New Delhi on Oct 4 2011. Six months have passed since Soni was tortured physically and sexually but neither the state nor the central government has investigated the abuse.
So, are you ready to see a D-I-A-S-T-E-R
Maile Rachel Hale, 26, Cambridge, Mass.
Keep giving all the love you can
My relationship with Pretty Boy Floyd has been rocky for a while—mostly because he has a drinking problem, and I refuse to put up with it. We were in a rough spot approaching the big V day. We actually weren’t even speaking to one another that morning.
5. Everybody Loves A Winner
But I endured.
Of course I have been lazy, starting blogs and abandoning them, lets just hope this one lasts, at least a few months longer than its predecessors. So I’ll start with probably the silly things you may not wish to read about my life, goals and that very thing pissing my neighbors of, the thing that keeps me from sleeping at night, always fighting me with lyrical arrows, spears, omorogun and atoris…
When the rest of the world's cares disappear, and you transform yourself into a person who lives at night, just for yourself, who can experience passion or heartbreak in three minutes' time-- the time of a single song, when you can imagine yourself here and now but at any time in history because nothing else is real except your partner's arm around your waist and the other hand holding yours and your feet moving in unison.
This weekend, the doorknob to my den coat closet (which is actually overflowing with paint cans and bins of puppy food in lieu of coats) was the first guinea pig.
I don't know if it could be defined as a certain income or a particular job but rather a state. Isn't it a feeling? When you know you've done your best, or you are the best at what you do. In my mind, that is success.
˜This happened in a blink of an eye
Narrow your choices. Decide at the outset what kind of accommodation you need. Whether you are travelling with friends, with children or with elderly people... this can change the parameters of your search. Think of the weather... winter travel means that you can stay somewhere more confined, without a pool but travelling in the summer changes all that. A refreshing swim at the end of a long dry day can make all the difference...
Regular visitors will know that today (Wednesday) I take part in Whats on your workbench Wednesday, hosted by Julia at Stamping Ground . What regular visitors also know is that my desk is always a mess.
The steins hold 25 ounces of beery goodness, while the pint glasses hold... wait for it - a pint. There are four different designs available for each style. You can buy each of the four steins individually (for 30 bones a pop) or all four in a set (for $100). Oddly, you can't buy any of the four pint glasses individually, or in a four-pack set. They're only available in sets of two (as seen above) for $30 each.
Ray watched him thrash and cough for a second, then looked up at Sonny.
The Washington Consensus vision is based on the theory of comparative advantage and the success of post World War II reconstruction of war-ravaged economies. It is based on neo-classical theory which correlates increased growth with increased capital input. It is also based on the theory of comparative advantage of national economies postulated by 19th century economist David Ricardo. But Ricardo also specified the necessary conditions that capital should not move between national economies and that there should be full employment. What he also implicitly assumed was the uniformity of human needs, motivation and aspirations. These conditions do not apply to today's globalised economy and by ignoring them we cause untold unintended consequences to manifest.
15. Mac Wiseman - Love Letters in the Sand
My second card for today uses Mehndi Wishes from Rupa. I have always loved those pretty henna tattoos that women get all over their hands, this one realllly reminds of them. The Gandhi sentiment is one of my favorites!
Want to see how well Elemental works with your video? Bring a video file to Elemental’s booth and we will transcode it on the spot in faster- than-real time!
I’m of two minds about it. On the one hand, I’m glad someone is trying to regulate these things, because it would benefit me directly, and benefit my family directly, to shut down a lot of these sites where intellectual property is being so freely distributed without anyone’s consent. On the other hand, I’m skeptical whenever the federal government tries to take control of anything. The future of the internet looks a lot like television, with all the associated corporate entities controlling the information. That scares me senseless.
Man does not have to wait for the Lord to act but God has to wait for men to be ready. In Matthew 8:5 a centurion came to Christ to have his servant healed. Looking ahead to verse 13, “And Jesus said unto the centurion, Go thy way, and as thou hast believed, so shall it be done unto thee. And his servant was healed in the self same hour.”
Paper: Rich Razzleberry, Whisper White
Focus: Speaking the truth
Please show the Cockneys they are not alone. Thank you.
laurence dacade boots
Ask your blog readers, your twitter followers, and even your facebook friends to do it too.
Oh boy, the holy one really screwed up when he gave us emotions.
Transfer the onions to the broth and add the remaining ingredients, cooking on medium heat for thirty minutes to and hour (I let it simmer while preparing the cornbread).
Is it surprising that the scarcity of the markers made them more valuable to the kids who only got three of them? Why do we value the ability of a child to "commit" to his original gift choice? Commitment based on fear that there might be no better options is not a skill. I have written my thoughts about quitting and committing, here, here, and here. I wonder which group of kids would be more likely to share their markers. I would bet a lot of money on the ones who had 24.
The humiliation of the trial and its resultant three-month prison sentence added to the hurts Moody had already suffered for her part in killing Chad Monroe. It wasn’t entirely her fault, though. When the boy began to convulse, too many hands had tried to loosen the thick rope wrapped around his small body like a cocoon.
Meanwhile skin your tomatoes. Just chuck them in a bowl and cover with boiling water. Wait about 30 seconds, then fish them out with a spoon and dunk straight away into ice cold water. After a minute or so take out and the skin will peel away in no time.
So do you think this information will help the recruiters, when they recruit from the market!! Well definitely, this gives a platform for the Recruitment team, based on which they can negotiate and hire from the external market. This does not mean that only recruiters get benefitted from it, in fact the candidates who are looking out can use this data and negotiate with their future employer.
Can you visualize where I live now?
I asked Luis about that dreaded part of the conventional office – all those interminable meetings!
And the lovely Mary Roach checking her notes (second from left) in the only picture I got where no one is making a weird talking face and there's not motion blur.
Mercedes’s day wasn’t all smiles though. Michael Schumacher had to retire early after the W03′s right, front wheel nut wasn’t screwed down. Mercedes weren’t the only team to suffer from pit stop errors. The boys from McLaren showed up, for a Malaysian Grand Prix encore, and botched Jenson Button’s chances for a win.
October 12, 2010
Batman gets the fire out and then notices the problems in Manhattan. The cops are trying to fight the giant robots but to no avail and Batman has a slight problem, he has no firepower on the Bat-plane so he can do little more than swoop around and be an irritant.
I know you're probably sick to death of hearing about Baltic Thunder, but hey, it's loose in the real world now: this isn't hype, it's after-action reports. Yesterday we were at a good friend's house to partake of a venison bounty his brother-in-law had brought home. He'd made a pork and venison stew, and a ground pork and venison meatloaf (he's Polish, I think he's got bigosh on the brain, but good on him, it was delicious).
We visited the Old Town (Stare Miasto) today and did lunch at a restaurant that really represents the best of New Poland. It was a place called Zapiecek that specializes in Pierogi (filled dumplings) with beautiful interior design and with waiting staff in traditional costume. The menus are really well layed out and your mouth is watering while you wait for the food. I had fried Ruskie Pierogi while Aga had placki węgierski (potato pancakes with goulash). We washed it down with beer and raspberrycordial which always hits the mark. At the table next to us there was an American girl with two Polish friends. It was really nice to hear her beautiful Polish, she really was trying hard to say everything correctly. My wife was really impressed.
Many of you will remember the late Kathy Staff for playing the redoubtable Nora Batty in BBC’s endless, pointless ‘comedy’ Last of the Summer Wine – a show about three old men which seemed to run for about a million years and which ended each episode with the old men falling over a wall. Oh the hilarity! One of them (Compo, played by the late Bill Owen) was head-over-heels in love with Nora Batty, a battle-axe in wrinkled surgical stockings who was married to the world’s dullest man. That’s about as much as you need to know. For some peculiar reason Last of the Summer Wine became the world’s longest running sitcom, with 31 series between 1973 and 2010.
doesn’t have to end in 240 minutes. It needs to end only when the Holy
I am Woman…Helen Reddy
Please let me know if you have any specific questions I can answer for you. I got a few after the first of these posts and I’ll try to answer any of your questions next time.
If you've never made homemade soap, I thought you might like to see a sequence of photos that would help you understand what is involved in getting a bar of soap out of some oils, lye, and distilled water.
I hope you are not tiring of my Europe posts? I may be back home but my heart is still there.
It also doesn’t help that we have a dog who loves to hide in random places (and is a tick magnet despite getting rigorous tick control).
The knitting bag will carry my revised ripple socks with me to Amsterdam (that's my hotel pool on the laptop in the photo above).
He had the hands of a poet and a way with his words
Colgate Save $.75/1 toothpaste 4oz+ (4/14)
In the book I discussed, among other things,
I really liked Pike’s characters. They had a lot of fun personalities and interesting interaction between them. They all reacted naturally to each other and didn’t act fake like some characters do. My favorite character, though, is Chelsea. Her sometimes brutally honest attitude is interesting and entertaining. She made the perfect complimenting friend for Laurel, who can be very guarded and almost shy.
meet rising tuition costs. The Krylon Clear Choice Art Scholarships also
Upon the death of longtime friend Princess Diana, Elton contacted Bernie Taupin and had him rewrite the lyrics to the classic 1973 hit “Candle in the Wind“, originally written in tribute to Marilyn Monroe. John sang the new version at Diana’s funeral and the subsequent re-release of the new version went on to be the top-selling single in Billboard History, selling over 33 Million copies worldwide.
One of the hardest things to do is to get people to move from their comfort zones. When you begin to implement your content management strategy and move to structured authoring, you will likely see some resistance from a few writers who will say, “That’s not the way we’ve always done it!” Ah, change! It can bring out the stubbornness in some people and make their boss’ hair turn gray as he drags them, kicking and screaming, into the new work environment.
Hats On!
Side note, the commenting thing is totally still not fixed. I can comment on some blogs but not on others. So hopefully that'll be rectified by the time that I'm back.
Not more than 1 hr away *
So instead of tackling the big things I keep distracting myself with cute little treasures that I seem to be finding so easily. Like these vintage tulip bowls I found at an antique store ... which by the way pier 1 now carries almost an exact version of.
Oh the joy!
Now a little about me, I am blissfully married to my wonderful, supportive “soul mate” BADEN. Our treasured family all feature throughout my work. There is nothing more important to
Holds a remaining spark of beauty
Thus far, the scheme has netted close to a billion dollars by selling “carbon credits” to utility companies and other firms in participating states, earning about $50 million through an auction held on December 1. The first auction was actually held in 2008, and there have been nine since then. Spoils from the emissions permits are then handed out by state governments to companies, environmental groups, and others.
Craig is handling everything wonderfully. But as a grandmother, I worry about his long term health.
Hello everyone! Here is a super cute and fun bag that I made for Peachy Keen's Anything Goes challenge this week. I am always in need of small gift bags, so this will be perfect for my stash. Can you tell that I am DYING for summer by the colors I am using? LOL!
Here are Jonathan’s most notable defects:
Mr. and Mrs. John Smith
On Facebook this morning I announced that it's International Karen Does Nothing Day today, and that my plan was to be lazy.
FA: We will try to enjoy the moment, the win, and work hard. We will have the same approach that we had in Valencia, that we had in Canada, and here as well every weekend. It is a weekend to try for the victory, try to win the race. There is not championship thoughts at the moment with anyone in the team as we know that the gap is massive at the moment with Sebastian. We just need to enjoy every weekend. Try to win every weekend and be aggressive at the start, the pit-stops, there is no time to think about any other thing.
I had this science class. In the spectacular sporadic and brief time I attended a public high school. I had by that time rebelled against private education because I wanted to be able to be myself and not hanging out with kids who wore socks with polo logos on them and had been turned upside down by neighbor girl who was “much older” and more sophisticated. I mean by a whole three years! At that time that was a lot. She was in love with my abrother as it seemed most girls were. His girl-peers would ask me what his favorite color was, his middle name. I was threatened with bodily-harm by him if I revealed that he liked the color blue or his actually cool middle name.
Spirit of the age! In me.But spirit not of this age.Nor any known.
Another technique is to see if the name is shared by someone who is famous.
Inspired by the stories of his 95-year old grandmother years ago, Mr. Clyde Vincent has dedicated most of his life to learning and keeping Cajun traditions & stories alive. Growing up in Port Neches’ neighborhood deemed “Little Abbeville”, he found his passion to rest in Cajun history and genealogy. Respected by many, he served as the president of Les Acadianes du Texas, a cajun cultural club in East Texas, for 30 years. In my grandfather’s words, “He is very honest, sincere and dedicated to Cajun culture…that is Clyde’s life.”
Get Ready for Some Good Clean Fun
Fresh Guacamole
Heh. This should be interesting...
Another friend reminded me of the importance of the staff in the story of the Exodus when the Israelites were brought out of slavery and traveled through the wilderness. The staff was used to perform many mighty acts of God in front of Pharoah and represented His authority and power. Even though Pharoah’s magicians could perform some wonders and signs, when the staffs were turned into snakes, Moses’ snake ate the others. In the same way, the enemy is a real force at work, but God is infinitely stronger and more powerful and will be victorious! As we serve the Lord, many will see His power and that He alone is King. The staff was used in the parting of the Red Sea; when Moses raised it (as the Lord said), the sea parted. When we exalt Jesus in our lives, obstacles will be removed, seas will part, problems will disappear! Just as the staff was turned into a serpent and high and lifted up when the people had been bitten by poisonous snakes after sinning and to be saved they had to look at it, we have to look at Jesus and His death (when He was high and lifted up on the cross) and believe in Him in order to be saved. Aaron’s budding staff represents all of us who are connected to the Vine, Jesus, and are alive in Him and bearing fruit through the power of the Holy Spirit in us. Moses held up the staff (with the help of Aaron and Ur) in order to ensure victory in battle for Joshua and the Israelites. We must all work together, doing our different parts and continuing to rely on God’s power – the power of the staff – to defeat the enemy. I could go on and on…
The NWC member said, “We are very pained with the comment of the NSA, who we considered ought to be part of us. Though there is no record that he is a member of our party, but being a senior member of the government which produced the President he is serving, he should not have taken us to the cleaners the way he did.
Er... right. Thank you.
Lissa Dragomir is a Moroi princess: a mortal vampire with a rare gift for harnessing the earth's magic. She must be protected at all times from Strigoi: the fiercest vampires--the ones who never die. The powerful blend of human and vampire blood that flows through Rose Hathaway, Lissa's best friend, makes her a Dhampir. Rose is dedicated to a dangerous life of protecting Lissa from the Strigoi, who are hell-bent on making Lissa one of them.
With the construction in the late 1950s of the Embarcadero Freeway, which passed right in front of the Ferry Building, views of the once-prominent landmark from Market Street were greatly obscured. Pedestrian access was treated as an afterthought, and people disliked having to use the second-class space. They were cut off from the waterfront.
So, now that it has officially ended and I have gone back to work three days a week, I'm surprised about how positive it's all feeling.
But it was allowed to shape you heart
Design Team Call
I was pretty down on my luck with employment a long time ago….and Im sure most can relate……. So I had taken a second job at …..DOMINOES!! …shaking head now……
We can only hope that once the Great Realignment completes in one country, it will have some kind of cascade effect on the others, speeding up the process there. Otherwise the Muslims will be laughing all the way to the mosque and the benefits office.
Mr. Bollywood and I met last year in La Bella Italia during a business trip. We spend a couple of very nice days together - working during the day but exploring the city during the eve, having dinner and lots of interesting talks (and ok, I admit: some kissing too!). At the end of the trip he told me he really liked me, but left it to me if I wanted to stay in touch. After thinking it over for a few days I decided that I actually would like that a lot.
They work back up to their feet, and now McCottrell has Darren up against the cage.
20. Greg Pope-Blue Ocean Sky (Self-Released)
My top three for this month are:
May 5 - I made the skirt, and not only that, it was always such a bad fit that on Friday and Saturday morning I cut two inches out of the back of it, including the zip, and sewed it back up with a new zip. I also shortened it by a centimetre and put new bias on the hem and OMG, New Skirt. Therefore no longer bored. This photo was taken at Gundaroo in the kitchen garden of Grazing. I am still daydreaming of the lovely White Jindabyne rabbit I ate at lunch.
Of fence by the ganger’s shed;
So, according to that definition, it would seem that all Christianity is evangelical. But that’s not the way the word is used in our culture. “Evangelical” is a label that, especially in the U.S. South, seems to encompass the majority of Protestants, especially where I’m coming from: Baptists, Pentecostals, and most non-denominational Christians. The churches that seemed to be excluded were more “high church” denominations, such as Catholics, Episcopals (Anglicans), and possibly Methodists.
- We demand affirmative action, in the interests of community cohesion, to promote Nazis to high positions in the security services.
This was taken from the window of an antique store. Those bottles look stunning and the rich honey, amber, mahogany, and magentas are reduced to dull brown without the sun to make them pop. Wish I could show you an example of this, but I would not have noticed the photo opportunity if it had been dark out.
bouncing passageway. Both feel old and battered. But that has
Heat a skillet on medium. Add the olive oil enough to come up halfway on the codfish cakes, less than 1/2″. When the olive oil is hot and a test piece sizzles, it is ready. Prepare the codfish cakes in the traditional form using two soup spoons, passing the dough between the two spoons to form a three-sided mini-football shape. Fry until golden brown on each of the three sides. Drain on paper towels.
“Please stop calling me that – my surname’s Amylase.”
I used Love Birds for my card. Colored the birds with prismacolor pencils and blended with odorless mineral spirits. Colored the rest of the image with copics and used Smooch for the inside of the flowers. Cut the sentiment apart to make it two lines to fit better in the oval Spellbinder. Added some bling from Want2Scrap and some ribbon.
I'm completely trying to ignore my depression. I'm pretending that I don't have it and that everything is great. I think that's the best way to deal with it. That's one subject matter less to talk about.
2. Given that last Sunday’s worship was 732, it’s a reminder to us that we are growing, and in order to accommodate the newer folks who are coming, we are switching all of our worship times starting June 3rd. The new times are 9, 10:15, & 11:30. We will also add a 3rd Sunday School hour, so that there will be children’s Sunday School at each worship hour. This will also help to alleviate some of the congestion in Sunday School.
All Apache models incorporate the new design and styling, namely RTR 160, RTR 180 and RTR 180ABS. In addition, the new range would have new pilot lamps integrated with LED light and a new aerodynamic styling reducing the engine heat.
#5 Thoughts One of the few people in the blogosphere whose posts I could relate to so much. Her posts are always a pleasure to read.
If you didn’t like David Howe asking his girlfriend, her BFF and their other friends to hand out the awards at the ceremony, how would you have felt if they had been appointed to a jury that decided eight of the awards? And how would you have felt about them having the ability to secretly kick your books off the shortlist? I doubt David would actually have done that, of course, and had those people been on a jury I’m sure they would have fulfilled their duties admirably and conscientiously, but that's the power the awards administrator and the jury will now have. It's easy to trust a hypothetical juror. Think of people you don't trust (for some of you that'll be me!): would you want them to have that power?
I do believe blogging can help, because in the blogosphere we meet people we'd never otherwise encounter. People outside our pack. We can exchange ideas and join debates which, under other circumstances, we wouldn't be exposed to.
and sweating hands,
Kane (to Cutler, re Golda): “If you touch her, I’ll have to touch you. No, not like that.”
- Copies of invoices from a range of suppliers in and around KwaMbonambi, from which the building materials were sourced.
Some of you are not on my personal page. Some of you are only following me on the reccomendation of someone else (and I’m very thankful that you are). Some of you are still waiting to read my writing.
The reason why Eberhard Havekost is farther towards doom than Tuymans or Richter is he does not allow as many touchstones, as many meaningful breaths of meaning in the swirling turbulent ocean of broken images. In Richter’s Atlas of photographs, for instance, we find the personal and the political mixed with the banal (and the same goes in Tuymans’ canon of imagery as well). To extend the issue to photography, even Thomas Ruff, that priest of the particulars of how photography carries meaning and then carries meaning away, finds a strange human animation in his jpeg series.
Before we share the scenarios, we did want to state that there are a number of ways to make this deal work based on what coupons you have and so many different combinations of products. We are going to show the best scenarios with each type of coupon that we were able to come up with. After speaking with CVS, the jumbo pack diapers are listed as 2 for $20, but you do not have to buy in groups of two to get the $10 price. So the jumbo packs are going to yeild the best value as you can use a coupon on each!
YSL counter. I stopped to see if they have the new lipstain: girl 1: I don’t know (wringing her hands) calls another girl,
Real pickling, and any type of fermentation is blowing my mind right now. When we have freezers and fridges running 24/7, burning coal to keep our food fresh, my hot pepper mash is simply bubbling in the basement. There's no hot water bath, no simmering for hours. It's by far the most energy efficient way to preserve.
In January the stormy weather earned this moon its name. Snow covered the earth and the howling of wolves could be heard echoing through the cold winter air. Some tribes called this the Snow Moon, but that name was more commonly used for the February moon.
Challenge 12: to post June 3
Check back tomorrow for a new challenge and new prize!!
From: Mr. David McClean
The domestic normality relieved him of some of the stress of his predicament with Tori.
I wrap my shawl tight around my thin, pale, shoulders... steel my body from your wooing
The novel begins with Bhagat visiting GangaTech college inVaranasito deliver a speech. There, he meets Gopal, the 26-year-old protagonist. He recounts to Bhagat his life story. Predictably, its is a love story, or rather a love triangle involving Gopal, and childhood friends Raghav and Aarti.
We (Activity Day GirLs) made this little snack to give to our dads for father's day...another quick and easy one.
Had the adults in our lives just have shut up and let us explore ourselves we would come up with our own beautiful and divine definition of self; without doubt, a far better view of self and certainly a much or unlimited idea of the possibilities in life. It's an insidious indoctrination but it need not be permanent. The belief that anything is permanent, within us, is the first untrue indoctrinated belief stored in our subconscious and the close second is the beliefs that beliefs are extremely difficult to change.
Dapper and Fluff.
I think this idea could be fun!
And have chosen to slow down and be more deliberate in design and construction
But so it goes, to quote the great man (now there's a supple subversive literary mind inside an old shell).
continent.
Especially if you’re not-
Just as this thought came to him, he heard something stirring downstairs. His first thought was that he was being robbed, so he stumbled down the stairs as quickly as he could and ran into the kitchen. What he saw there terrified him more than any group of robbers ever could, because there, at the stove, was the long, curly hair of his wife. He dared not approach, for fear that she would turn, and it would be another zombie of his dreams. Finally, she turned, her face exactly as it was before he had defiled it with a screwdriver. "Michael, come sit down. I made pancakes." Her smile was genuine, but that did not ease Michael's mind. He did as he was told though.
My parents came over for something to eat.
‘How do you want me?’ she says, sitting up. Beneath her tweed combo there’s a formidable range of slips and tights, thermal body stockings and a vast, cantilevered bra, but she unbuttons, out-tucks and de-hooks herself to skin level with Olympic dexterity.
Dear lord. WHO, tell me, WHO wears a halter top to go horseback riding?? Well. This girl did. It was a hot summer day, but that is no excuse for my idiocy. We started trotting a bit, and all was well. It was around the second gallop that I realized... hmm... it's a little... chilly. No, more like NIPPY. Yes. As in, my shirt had untied and I was pulling a Lady Godiva.
There isn’t a limit, but we’ve worked out the average pay-out for the 2011/12 cycle was £14,133.
Believe, Life's Little Occasions, K & Company
recalls Bush. "'Cos what they do is so... profound and so ancient,
Here are mine: (this is harder than I expected)
As of today, I am inclined to support Romney because his economic philosophy is so consistent with mine, but I will remain open-minded to other candidates who show more social tolerance.
Sleep: pass two nights haven't been good..prob because when Mr. Southbay is home I can't sprawl out.. :) He made the comment.. "We need a king size bed!" I need room these days!
It shocks many parents and even professionals alike when I mention that certain vaccines are cultured on aborted human foetal remains. The immediate response seems to be stunned silence followed by an incredulous ‘what?’ or just sheer disbelief. Even my health visitor exclaimed
We just spent an altogether too short weekend in Galveston, on the Texas coast. We were there for less than 48 hours, but I came away refreshed, relaxed, and recharged. In the future, I'll endeavor not to soon forget the healing power of the salty sea breezes and a long stretch of beach.
While we were in one store, he called to ask me about ordering airline tickets online. He wanted me to talk him through the process screen-by-screen, but I am not tech support. I finally suggested that he leave it to me and I would order the tickets later that day when I had access to a computer.
The entire card only uses 1 piece of designer paper. She chose a lovely small gingham pattern from "Designer Paper Pack," made by Crafts - Too.
35) Man, you sure are easy on the eyes!
We’ll be making more visits to Native Quest… next month there is a button blanket class. I have a lot of work to do on regalia… I am excited to work with others on projects and learn new things.
Almonds and craisins - yum, salty and sweet.
He returned a shaven-headed Buddhist and admitted experimenting with mind-bending drug LSD.
16. Acceptance - Compromise
Turns out that one of the young 'men' has tainted another of the young men's manhood with a stray drunk comment or two, and they're now bashing the shit out of each other next to Robert's limousine. For a moment I think about it. Then I decide that all I'll get is a large dry-cleaning bill, so I simply watch as these two gentlemen settle matters with honour. Frankly, I wished they'd used duelling pistols...that would have been more interesting.
History/Geography
O’er joint and gristle and padded hoof
studio.. well that and my coffee maker.
1 carrot, coarsely chopped
Dear Gigi,
So this morning I had a meeting with my boss. I had prepared and was ready for the meeting. What I was not prepared for was waking up 10 minutes before the bus came. (In Turkey lots of employers send buses for their employees—I don’t ride with the kids.) Bulent would not have been able to drive me this morning. He needed to get to work himself in a different direction.
the truth became clear: væmpires were former vampires. And each væmpire was a bigger, stronger, faster version of its former self—with a second thumb on each hand and an altered physical appearance, to boot.
“Shower, shave? Why do I have to…”
While driving around on Friday I heard on the radio about an event this past weekend (April 14-15, 2012) called Doors Open Denver. I went home and Googled Doors Open Denver and found out it is a FREE 2-day event celebrating architecture and design. The 2012 theme is “Denver Landmarks.” I found a very thorough explanation of Doors Open Denver on The Denver Architectural Foundation website (http://denverarchitecture.org/programs/doors-open-denver) .
Dry fry corriander, pepper, methi
Laid Hair Care? I hadn’t heard of it either! I was lucky enough to have a friend gift me a few of their products, which include the Luscious Locks Shampoo, Conditioner and Hair Mask.
Here is today's inspiration:
What a great find, but what I really love is the guy who found it. "Take a picture for your blog," he suggests, but of course I already have the camera ready. I snapped the picture just as he said "This is my first purchase, #1, but more to come."
Here is the easiest way that I can explain how we get to Machu Picchu on the cheap. A slight variance will depend on your bargaining skills and tolerance for sitting some extra hours. Our exact route is shown below:
I tried to remember what got me started blogging...
Great raw and nasty full speed ahead early 80's hardcore...I recommend you pick up a copy of this Lp before they are gone as Who Care's? releases tend to disappear very quickly and are very hard to come by...Dave G.
As is very often the case, it was the unintentional ministrations of my daughter that pulled me out of my funk. Her laughter and cheerfulness, to be exact. She was asking me questions, and making observations about the geese and the dogs and the rocks on the water's edge. She giggled and held my hand. She spoke to me of many things that matter to the mind and heart of a child. She made jokes, and laughed.
But no real wife can be wifely enough. The marriage fluctuates between good, bad and merely tolerable. Even during a good period, Cheever is confused about cause and effect.
If you own a property that has asphalt pavement for a driveway or parking area you will need to take necessary steps in order to maintain the surface. If the proper steps are taken to maintain the asphalt surface, it can last for many years.
Pattaya massage girls are a whole different breed altogether. They may be beautiful, charming, sexy, alluring, and sensuaL but they are not necessarily go-go girls who’s objective is to find and bed as many foreign men as possible in the briefest time possible.
A pod of six bottlenose dolphins intervened, and the shark let go. The dolphins formed a protective ring around Endris and helped him get to shore, where a couple of friends provided quick first aid. “The guys who rushed to help, the dolphins — they all saved my life”, he says, in an interview with TODAY News.
We had a super great Halloween- all October actually. I think there is no better place to be in October than here. Weather is perfect- cool nights, warmish days and leaves that change ALL month. It is spectacular in these hills! I always get into the Halloween "spirit"
If I had not known differently I would have thought that yesterday was Friday 13th. We had a right day and a half of it at work. By yesterday lunch time my head was spinning and I do not think that I have ever been as glad to come home as I was last night. I know that the closer we get to Christmas the more manic Fridays will become. Looking back to a year ago I wrote a post saying that I would not be doing this pre-Christmas holiday work stint again. Well that was what I thought at the time. The work situation has not quite gone to plan and it seems that I just cannot say 'no'. Anyway this really is the last time.
I am so appreciative of your support of our wonderful group.
Special Needs Gift Guide for Christmas 2011!
How else can you explain the popularity of someone as intellectually counterfeit and ethically suspect as Glenn Beck in America?
Illiberal and Misconceived – finish any and all drinks you have.
He said it was an old case given to them, and they were just trying to get rid of it. As luck would have it, I showed up. Coincidence, I think not!
“Three people living in a house were
The veterinary science facility owns six horses; all of whom I've counted, identified, nearly assigned my own names to, and look out for each morning. I nearly fell over on Monday when I witnessed turnout. Unlike the farm where I lived and worked for a year, instead of taking the horses out one by one and placing them into carefully assigned paddocks, the keepers open the gates to the Vet compound and let the horses out. Onto the road. Where they have free rein (pun intended) to find their own grazing, just like the donkeys. One stallion and broodmare like to graze by old hay barns next to our office building. She's old and looks to be pregnant again, white hairs and a bit of rain rot ruffling her bay coat. Her filly frequently lays down and suns herself along the red mud driveway. This morning on my way to tea break, the grey stallion (a rather appropriate color sometimes called flea-bitten) let me approach him to pat and scratch his face. Even though he lacks muscle found through steady training and can use a bit more careful care on his coat, he looks well-enough fed and contented. Just petting a horse can make my day a good one.
Even if the cheques had stopped coming, I think we would have worked on him---he was a lovely horse with so much guts and seemed to have an understanding of his predicament---he helped us help him.
With Elegance Nail System, the quickest way to build an impressive organization is through the home party system. This way Distributors can set their own business tempo. They can either host occasional parties at a relaxed pace, or host regular parties in turbo mode.
Booktalk: Lola becomes a big sister in her latest story celebrating books and reading. From potty time to bath time to nap time, Lola knows just the right book to read to baby Leo.
Bring out and allow to cool completely on a wire rack or you can have them hot and fresh.
Sweet Thing...OMGosh! She fit into a size 8 WOMEN'S shoe!! It took awhile to find a pair for church that were flat vs the heels. She also got a pair of tennis shoes in size 8.5!
At least that’s how Bob Geisenberger sees it.
Be specific! Because our lifestyle is normal to our kids, it is hard for them to express their thoughts about it and put them into words. Asking a child from an average household how he feels about eating packaged cereal, will get you the same blank stare as asking one of mine how he feels about eating bulk cereal.
Jill pulls Ramoner aside and says "it's not really dog food!" and then explains to the camera that she lives to mess with Brad. Poor Brad. He probably slipped off to the bathroom and had some bulimia.
For the finale Anne did step a little bit off the mark. This is certainly a stunning beaded lace gown by Tom Ford but I'm not sure anyone can do it justice. Well, a George Michael video and the name Nadja Aurmann come to mind.
1) Referral acquisition is no longer reliant on word of mouth: Just a few short years ago, in order to cultivate referrals, financial and insurance professionals needed to deliver good products and service, communicate consistently and give clients an experience to talk with others about. Today all of that is still true, but it becomes meaningless unless what people are ultimately saying about you matches what can be found online.
A wrong turn in a rainstorm leads Englisher Amelia Devries to Michael Hostetler--and the young Amishman's charming Old Order community of Hickory Hollow. Despite their very different backgrounds, Amelia and Michael both feel hemmed in by the expectations of others and struggle with how to find room for their own hopes. And what first seems to be a chance encounter might just change their lives forever.
Together with the Porsche Development Centre in Weissach near Stuttgart, Germany, the Porsche Engineering Group has been offering Porsche’s extensive development expertise as a service to its clients from the automotive industry and other sectors worldwide, from renting test rigs to developing complete vehicles.
Shall conquer, though they die;
Wed 19 @ Harpa - Reykjavík Concert Hall
Throughout history there have been leaders who have tried to dominate the world, and all were successful to a point, but failed miserably in achieving total domination. There will always be people who will refuse, who will reject, all attempts to shove something down their throats. There will always be rebels.
I continue to battle a little with my disability and will be having an MRI scan in a few weeks but the help I get from my carers is invaluable and the adult company is most welcome.
grows
The idea is to think of the craziest, zaniest set-up for a cozy mystery you can—this is strictly for entertainment value—we don't plan to take these ideas and actually write series (though if you think YOU want to, go for it!). But we are asking you to come up with a wacky theme, a zany sleuth, a crazy setting for your OWN Crazy Cozy Mystery idea.
God bless you in your service for Him.
That evening we headed out to Mallory Square to see the beautiful sunset. "This is a ritual on Key West where everyday at dusk visitors gather at this seaside spot to watch the spectacular sunset and enjoy the lively street performers."
An inexperienced agent is not a bad agent by default. And "experience" isn't some sort of universal either. I'm pretty experienced but if you hand me category romance, I'd be a VERY bad agent since I don't know the genre, don't read it, and don't know the editors who buy it.
- all complete with stove, sink with tap, oven, cabinet, hanging rack, dish rack etc
Steven: Hello?
He launched a deep fly ball to left field that gave the Yankees the lead. They would go on to score another, taking a two-run lead into the bottom of the 10th. Plan B for Haney and the Braves.
"I can't believe it," says the first man.
7.Roy Harvey + Jess Johnston - No Room For A Tramp
The first option was Grady. I “politely” declined. Unless I’d been shot or stabbed, I wasn’t going back there. I’d been there once before, and, well that’s a story for another time. And no, my first and only “visit” to Grady had nothing to do with being shot or stabbed. It just happened to be close at that time.
Houghton Mifflin Harcourt
Here's the light:
Style is a matter of bringing out to the world the essence of who you are. Done properly, you will never make a fashion mistake again!
The cons are that I seriously need some new road running shoes, my body is still recovering from the Kentucky Derby Marathon, and I am sleepy with a 3.5 hour drive ahead of me (although I just drank a medium Starbucks mocha, so I am starting to pep up).
Today, when the influence of Western Civilization is breaking up the static, tradition-bound culture of Japan, young Japanese composers are doing talented work in the Western style of music.
It's for Ursus beer from Bucharest and it's supposedly one of the best selling beers in it's native country. Indeed, it brands itself as 'The King of Romanian Beers'.
Keep your women happy, boys.
The Nicene Creed was revised at the Council of Constantinople in A.D. 381, and in this revised form (known as the Niceno-Constantinopolitan Creed) it continues to be used by the Greek Orthodox Church, the Roman Catholic Church, and by some Protestant churches, as a confession of faith. Most Lutherans recite this Creed during their worship services at least once a month. Even those who do not use this Creed in their liturgies generally acknowledge the correctness of its teaching. Most Protestant confessions and summaries of doctrine have incorporated its language. For instance, the Westminster Confession (used as a doctrinal standard in conservative Presbyterian churches) reflects the Nicene teaching of the eternal generation of the Son in one of its paragraphs concerning the Trinity: “In the unity of the Godhead there be three persons, of one substance, power, and eternity: God the Father, God the Son, and God the Holy Ghost: the Father is of none, neither begotten, nor proceeding; the Son is eternally begotten of the Father; the Holy Ghost eternally proceeding from the Father and the Son.” (chapter 2, paragraph 3.) In this confession, a Scripture reference following the words “eternally begotten of the Father” points to John 1:14 and 1:18, as support for the doctrine.
Argumentation: Christ praises and worships the Father, so much of the Psalms dedicated to praising God.
Fast-forward 2-3 hours and it’s time to get everything assembled. So, rinse and boil your green lentils and rinse and boil 1 cup of quinoa. While that’s happening, pop on your tomato sauce by grabbing those pre-roasted tomatoes, onion and garlic and chucking them into a pot. Add sea salt, pepper, oregano and basil to taste, plus 1-2 bay leaves and a sprig of rosemary for added zing, before filling up sauce with 1/2 cup of water. Simmer for 15-20 minutes, blend in a food processor and you’re good to go.
Russell Javors – electric and acoustic guitars
-NativeJournalist
They explain that the aging of the human body, just like the aging of man-made machines, results from an accumulation of various types of damage. As with man-made machines, this damage can periodically be repaired, leading to indefinite extension of the machine’s fully functional lifetime, just as is routinely done with classic cars. We already know what types of damage accumulate in the human body, and we are moving rapidly toward the comprehensive development of technologies to remove that damage. By demystifying aging and its postponement for the nonspecialist reader, de Grey and Rae systematically dismantle the fatalist presumption that aging will forever defeat the efforts of medical science.
Small house publishing, POD and Vanity (Shared investment costs)
Rolls-Royce Trent 1000 engines have been used in the new plane, which launched commercially last November.
One day he called me and said, “I am staartin’ (sic) a restaurant, Ajoy, and I want you to do a cooking class on Indian food for me. You and Meera will fly down to Noosa stay with me and show the Aussies how to make a good khorma.”
Then I mixed 1 cup of freshly brewed coffee with 3 tablespoons of lime juice, 3 tablespoons molasses, and a seeded and minced jalapeño.
Yesterday I was busy trimming up some overgrown holly bushes in prep for some new front yard landscaping then I was moving moss. YES...MOSS! I FREAKING LOVE MOSS and with the mild cool winter I have an abundance of it. so i've been painstakingly moving it from one location to the gaps in my interlocking brick sidewalk at the other side of the house. I have some natural growing moss in those gaps but i want EVERY gap filled. It is crazy sometimes the things I enjoy that occupy my time.
A New Month! We’re one third of the way through 2012, and I managed to hit the story’s first time skip right on schedule! As has become customary, I’ll leave comments open today to celebrate finishing another month of Galleries of Stone. You’re welcome to say hello!
Rather than feel TOO sorry for myself about not being with so many of my crafty friends at CHA in Anaheim, I decided to do some stamping this weekend. Didn’t get much else accomplished, but at least I had fun!
I wrote in my journal:
Here is the list of participants for June...
Steel Trap so wants to be a Saw movie that it's embarrassing. Aside from a few balloons and less cancerous whingeing, it follows the template of a Saw right down to the pig's head and barbed wire. It's a boring film, full of bickering, mediocre performances and a distinct lack of gore. Georgia Mackenzie plays the lead character, a celebrity chef. It's good that she's front and centre, since everyone else is shouty and annoying. Never mind the murder and all the torture, the guest list already makes this the party from hell.
Ann: Claire has gradually got better and better and better. I marvel at her sometimes. When she left hospital she could only walk about two steps, and four adults needed to help her get upstairs to get to bed. She refused to sleep downstairs. Now she can go upstairs on her own, or just with me one step behind her. She still needs support, she can get stuck with words a lot. She swears a lot. She has to remember not to lean too far over to the right – the stroke affected her right side – or she’ll topple over.
4 oz. fresh mozzarella, thinly sliced
I am thrilled that this is my first plan to be linked to the Just One Bite Facebook page! For Just One Bite readers visiting my blog for the first time - welcome! I hope that these menu plans inspire you to try some new meals with your family and even to reconsider making some recipes during the work week that you would not have tackled before! I try to provide as many tips as possible for a busy working mom or dad to get these meals on the table as quickly as possible on work nights!
Security! Can you come back up on stage again?
Weapons cache found in T'kei
$42.00 includes shipping
I don't love you when you holding my hips
Re-read: You’ll definitely want to revisit this one every once in a while. It’s one of those books that helps you really believe that love conquers all. And who doesn’t love that?
When it came time to cut the wire, our wire cutter wasn't doing the trick,
Do you have an extra rope? Try hanging it from door handles or hinges!
The next day, the lion, whose name turned out to be Black Prince, was skinned and put on display for ten cents a look. Lion’s teeth were also for sale as souvenirs, and before long, stories were being told all over South Brooklyn of wild animals performing circus tricks all by themselves in vacant lots. Usually the person telling the story hadn’t seen them, but he had it on good authority from someone who had that a few of the escaped animals from Dreamland were still on the loose. The stories were told for years, somewhat reminiscent of the “alligators in New York sewers” stories.
O Patience, madd’ning virtue, layers drop
A couple’s home was invaded in the middle of the night. Masked men violently broke in, knocking the husband out and terrorizing the wife. Who knows what they would’ve done had her sleeper alien not come out and stopped it, severely maiming them. The woman/alien had no idea she was an alien, thus the sleeper part.
Looks like a proud mama. I love the innocence of a child and I plan to keep mine that way for as long as possible. I love that she has no doubt that God would choose her to be the second virgin to have a bear...I mean, baby. She doesn't doubt that her mom and dad will love her and be there for her when she needs us. She doesn't doubt that food is plenty and we will always have a home.
· These false expectations and unrealistic attitudes can lead to the cultivation of self-pity(1 Kings 19:14).
The inhabitants of these ramshackle structures, face a range of social problems, from a lack of clean water and electricity in their homes, to inadequate health care, and crime, not to mention very real fire risk. It’s a very sad situation, which is by no means unique to South Africa. These residential formations which are built without legal permits, house approximately a billion people worldwide, according to ‘UN Habitat.’ The make-shift shelters are constructed out of anything they can find, from corrugated iron and old wooden boxes, to plastic sheeting Many people will be born in such places, with no hope of ever improving their lot. Others are forced into living this way, because of a declining economy which has taken away their means of supporting themselves and their family in the manner which they were previously used to.
In March, Quaker moved creative advertising to Omnicom’s Energy BBDO, Chicago, from BBDO sibling Juniper Park in Toronto. The cereal, oatmeal and snack-bar maker spent $59.7 million in measured media on its brands in 2011, according to Kantar Media.
Maritess: I could make her booger beans.
Public relations, not a presumption of innocence, dictated the administration’s reversal of course. As Bob Steel, chairman of the Board of Trustees and Brodhead’s most vehement supporter, informed the New Yorker, “We had to stop those pictures [of the players practicing]. It doesn’t mean that it’s fair, but we had to stop it. It doesn’t necessarily mean I think it was right—it just had to be done.”
committed to and of course, making my visits to the hospital,
I fast forward and hope that my son doesn’t have to know what I’ve known. I fast forward and hope that my son will never see what I’ve seen. Because I’ve seen the face of evil. In so many forms. In those that spew hate in ignorance. In those that spew hate with conviction. In those that spew hate under the name of their god. In those that equate pride of their own with hatred of others.
Here are some other things that are on my life long list:
Researching (expands to fill available time)
There are some things that you can keep in your mind regarding selecting veterinarians. First of all, you need to check the professional repute of that person. This you can do by asking people, your friends and family or those who are into the business of animal breeding or kennels or pet services spots. The veterinary should not be educated in the required field but should also be experienced. Then, you are to check the local of the 5th clinic as well so that it should not be a botheration to take your pet over there. The last thing should be your budget. It is not recommended that do choose the cheapest veterinary for your pet rather see thoroughly what comes under your budget with all the facilities.
Ask easy questions. Being a wallflower at these types of events isn’t the point, you want to mingle with others and ask easy to answer questions such as, “may I join you?” or “what brings you to this event today?” This will be an easy way to insert yourself into the conversation. The key here is to listen to the response and process it. Although this may be just small talk, you want to engage in the conversation.
Please read through our enrollment instructions and school policy before you reserve your classes:
1 was from the vampire ball, books on the tables again
Posing for the totally unimaginative/uncreative wedding photographs. So staged and with a shadow in everyone’s eye!
“The Dow Jones Industrial Average, the S&P 500 and the other major stock market indices finished yesterday with the best two-day showing since 2002. I’m looking at the market rally of the past two days as a classic stock market bear trap. As the economy gets closer to contraction, 2008 will likely be a most challenging economic year for Americans.”
what everyone is striving for now,
I'm a long gone daddy in the U.S.A.
how am i going to leave my kids just a couple weeks after school starts?!
1 desired
Fresh mint leaves, for garnish
I'm not a man to give up easily when I've got the scent of culture in my nostrils, even if it's mixed just a little with the smell of bleach. Pausing only to take a (quite decidedly horrible) coffee in the misnamed 'Garden Bar' (now a shabby room, on the first floor, whose only access to the anything like a garden was the glimpse of a boring patch of grass through a dirty window) I made my way back to reception, determined to be directed to whatever works of art the Centre was hiding - however minimalist they were.
Strong experience with SSIS
I am 95% certain that none of the candidates have been round knocking on doors in my street, (if you have, it’s only at times when my neighbours and I are all out, which when you have shift workers, stay at home mums, and people with normal 9-5s, would be bloomin amazing, but I guess we can give you a 5% chance!) If you do not knock on my door and speak to me, how can you know what I think? How can you know what my issues are?
50/50
Just be sure to read and complete the requirements
On a recent visit to Bubbles to stock up on beer for a special occasion, I picked up the following items:
the bookshop Penguins
In the heart of the glass I saw galaxies born
Here is some lovely May Flowers inspiration from the Design Team:
WITNESS: Because his brain was sitting on my desk in a jar.
3. Create sentiment by masking exclamation point on "You Rock", compose -IT and MAN! using Fresh Alphabet
I should have taken some photos of the finished Dolls But I forgot my camera at the hotel the last day ... Colleen and I still Had another day in the Lake Mary area after the workshop ..so we made plans to meet Anne at the place Called " Space Craft " after a little treasure hunting there we went to a cute bead shop, Then Anne treated us to Lunch at the cheese cake factory , needless to say it was a yummy meal.
1 magna
“I think I’ll call him this week and we’ll see what happens. I’m sure he’s not expecting me to ring but that’s why it’ll be funny – and that’s why I’m going to do it.”
Red is also color of LOVE. Sensual , stimulating color of passion and seduction.
I have had a terrible day. Started off by almost over sleeping, panic to get to work. Got there with minutes (2) to spare. I normally don’t sleep more than the first 5 or 6 hours, but last night I slept seven and a quarter. Home again by 10:30. E-mails and the like, then I needed a nap. I felt so tired. My nap extended to three hours. Hence, I am here and the day has gone… whoosh! Went.
OLIVIER – 12.00
Inks: Memento Tuxedo Black ink and Ladybug Red
This little turkey stared out as an Easter Chick. You can see the cutting file here. All I had to do to turn him into a turkey was to cut another foot to use as his turkey waggle thingy (not sure of technical name for that). To keep in the spirit of using what I have in my stash, I used some artificial leaves I bought a few years ago for his feathers. To finish the card off I used some fall striped paper I have had in my stash forever. I bought a whole pack of it at a discount store and it's going to take a while before I run out.
Even though the Allsop Irish auction website was this morning displaying a message saying “our next Irish auction will be held on the 30th November 2011” a representative of Space, Allsop’s local partner, says that the catalogue for the 23rd September 2011 auction will be available later today or tomorrow as details are just now being finalized, and the auction will be going ahead exactly as planned. The publication of the catalogue is two days after the date which had previously been publicized.
from unnamable skin.
The Amateur is a reporter’s book, buttressed by nearly 200 interviews, many of them with the insiders who know Obama best. The result is the most important political book of the year. You will never look at Barack Obama the same way again.
Well i hope i havent bored you all,off to link up now and go visit some blogs before work,x
Your hand will no longer touch me Time goes by
This is a PNP exclusive. Handed to me by one of the Stahl brothers or skeeter back in my pre-pubic hair days.
The thing I don’t understand is just how these violent games keep on falling into the hands of these kids. The age ratings are all over the boxes and… OH COME ON!
Taken at Dusk by C.C. Hunter
This entire bogus brouhaha about the White House and Contraception is a scam.
Otherwise, not much really going on in baseball news. Red Sox appear set. Yankees are set. Now it is just going to see what happens with spring training about to start (9 days baby!).
Another short ride over the mud and hardpack put me back on the roads once more, gently undulating lanes back to the caravan. My wife was a little concerned that I was an hour later than the 30 minutes I’d put aside to get the supplies in.
Taib was handed one of the world’s last remaining gems of nature and traditional culture and he couldn’t wait to cash it in – for himself. He may hang on to power by buying supporters, imprisoning critics and rigging elections, but Taib must now know that reputation is one of the things that cannot be bought. His will follow him to the grave and beyond as the man who put greed before responsibility, compassion and concern for the people he was entrusted to govern.
Can you now
While some recipes haven't been as tasty as we hoped, one of our favorites to-date is a Tikka Masala recipes that we found in Real Simple Magazine.
As soon as they powered up the generator, they heard an enormous gushing of water, as if some ancient machine had resumed it’s task of pumping out an old undersea cavern.
In February, the UN Security Council raised pan African peacekeeping force authorized strength to 17,731 troops. Once the process of integrating Kenyan and Sierra Leonean units in south Somalia is complete, the force will have a presence in the regions of Bay, Gedo and Lower Juba in addition to Banadir and Middle and Lower Shabelle
Our final morning, we got up early to leave. We were sad to go but the bright side was seeing the view from the terrace. The morning fog looked foggy and magical--right out of Peter Pan. Polruan, we miss you already! Thank you for having us, Milly! xoxo
1/2 cup dried cranberries or other dried fruit
Last month, we got rid of cable TV in order to save a little money, so now we watch stuff past its prime via Netflix or Hulu. This is working extremely well (and thanks to my friend Beth for telling me about Roku, too) since we don't mind watching stuff a day or two later (or years later, in some cases.)
Marco Antonio Alvarez Soto, The Watchtower, April 1, 2012
Harry Hitzeman
When contacted by The Edge Financial Daily, Aberdeeen Asset Management fund manager Abdul Jalil Rasheed said: “A lot of the car manufacturing brands are owned by one company, where divisions like R&D are shared by all the different divisions within the company”.
So what do you think? Will mom like any of these? Do you have any good ideas for Mom this year?!
Comment: what are you favorite kids books about nutrition?
You responded, No, not me.
He cocks his head and examines me up and down, probably looking for weaknesses. “Is that doubt I hear? These puny humans are finally starting to show a little will of their own instead of bowing down to the mighty Paradigm?”
Put the flour, yeast, cinnamon and brown sugar in the bread maker bowl. Add the melted butter, milk, yogurt and beaten egg. Set to 'dough' and go away and do something else. My bread machine takes 45 minutes to make a dough.
3. You can also earn an extra entry by signing up for my challenges at Skeches4All in Erin Reed's Challenges (please post in the challenge section that you have joined for this contest, if you already are a member then post again!!)
Let's put a jake brake on the plot now: Coyote Bus Lines is in the final stages of creating Cyclops, a nuclear-powered mass-transit bus which will be the first to offer non-stop service between New York City and Denver. After an explosion kills both its driver and co-driver and gravely injures the head scientist on the project (Harold Gould) his daughter Kitty (Stockard Channing), must find as a replacement Dan Torrance (Joseph Bologna), a once-respected bus driver and old flame of Kitty's, now disgraced after being accused of cannibalizing his passengers after a crash on a snowy mountain road (he only ate a foot, though). He is soon recruited and paired with old friend "Shoulders" O'Brien (John Beck) who will be his wing man... uh, wheel man. A narcoleptic wheel man, but hey....
Kojiro Hongo was born February 15, 1938 in Okayama, the eldest son of a hardware store owner. Hongo became intensely interested in Judo from an early age, and it became his passion. His father was acquainted with Hideo Matsuyama, a producer at Daiei’s Kyoto Studios, who happened to see a photo of the 20-year old Hongo (in his Judo uniform), belonging to his mother. After seeing this photo, the president of Daiei, Masaichi Nagata, immediately insisted on meeting the young man.
As a reader, I personally like a wide variety of characters. I love the selfless wall flowers like Fanny Price as much as the witty and brash Elizabeth Bennet. (Both Jane Austen characters, btw ;)
Here's a little peek into the Cookie Swap, along with a simple recipe for Butterfinger Wannabes...a great treat that is so very easy to make and even more delicious to eat!
Congratulations!
Oh yeah... and I get to post a selection of books with my name on, to show you the covers. How cool is that?
I believe every one of us has a problem or issue that he or she is facing at this very moment! The good news I want to share with you is in every mess there is a message. Be patient with the mess to get the message that God wants you to receive from it. God is remolding you from dirt to clay, from clay to a beautiful piece of pottery, for all to see and bare witness. God plans for you are victorious. Place your hope in him. Your faith is in his hands through his promises in the book of lamb.
Appearance (0-3): Cloudy amber with a dense off-white head. 2 points.
Probably the rudest song I’ve ever heard. Still, underneath the filth there’s some seriously skillful rhyming and one of the most adorably infectious hooks in pop memory.
He is tell us, to be sure to listen thoroughly and weigh the response that we give so that when we speak it is not uniformed, emotional or irrational. Rather, it is deliberate, intentional and proper.
Judge Death lives!
Power Points: 6
According to Chapter 17 (Construction Impacts) of the Final Environmental Impact Statement, the arena would take "less than three years" to build or, by my calculations, 32 months--not two years or 30 months, as others have said.
A few weeks before I left for vacation a Facebook friend invited me to join Yardsellr. I hadn't heard of the site at the time so I checked it out and ended up joining. After doing so I kept getting several e-mails where so & so joined and I won Photons or a friend gifted me Photons. Photons are basically Yardsellr currency from what I can tell. I still don't have the whole site figured out, but I did find a few cards that peaked my interest.
We would like to see your take on this sketch created by our very one Kristin. Feel free to use whatever product and techniques of your liking-show us your talents girls.
“We lived long years where no one could speak a word …
The soundscape that accompanied the experience of these works added to the working assemblage of constructing their meaning. The juxtaposition of the well off, high middle class and the open display of the lower rungs of society and the resultant reactions were a jarring reminder of the socio-political landscape that we occupy in our contemporary urban landscape. “Images without sound are powerless to express horror”. [2] The exegesis of this horror is essential to begin a process of constituting the subject and the individual within this environment of the exhibition space. Allowing for an affective re-constitution that transforms both agents within this assemblage of meaning. There is a rebellious duty to disturb that is evident in each piece by Strauss. Art is meant to disturb and disrupt the status quo. In other words to question.
For those we smother with love – and for those who will grab the hand of anybody kind enough to offer it.
3. Cowboy's Heaven
General goals
Ok, it's not really snowing here in Georgia, but, when I saw the new Blue Ice thread from Handy Hands it just called out to me to make snowflakes with it. I used size 40 thread and they came out about 2.5 inches across from point to point. I've done 2 and I'm working on a 3rd which I will post soon. They look like lovely ice crystal snowflakes to me :-)
1 tablespoon all purpose flour
Now -
Doors at 8:00pm
The religion of Atheists is about preaching the “gospel” that God does not exist, converting those on the fence or even those of faith to give it up. Atheists insist that all religious belief must be given in up in order to for society to advance. Going beyond non-belief, they see belief and faith as destructive forces that must be countered. Touting a message of reason, they pervert good science and logic. Destroying your faith is their goal, and an increasing number of atheists are willing to not only admit that but to proclaim it.
When they hear that I wish to attend seminary, people ask, “Why?” And I think, “What a silly question to ask.” I’d like to ask them why do they breathe, or why a hungry man is eating food? For a while this question perplexed me, as, in loving God, it seemed the natural thing to do. But now I think that I have an answer.
After I recovered, I again told him that "hell" is usually considered a swear word - and so it's probably not a good idea to use it around his friends or at school. But that I was proud of him and his command of the English language.
Please include accurate desired length so I make may it exactly to fit you.
No lions, tigers or bears in this rural jungle but a more miniscule beast.
H is doing wonderfully in school, and as a reading assessment has been done, we've determined he's reading a full year ahead of his current age. He's got friends galore, and always greets me with a smile on his face after school.
There is no "now" here = n o w h e r e.
Musings on a series of unfolding plots: What is being kept from us The Return of Christian Terrorism The Great American Bank Heist – On the Day we Reach a Monthly Foreclosure Filing Record Banks Announce Record Profits and the Stock Market is up 80 Percent. Foreclosure rates surge, biggest jump in 5 years International Users Count Me Out – Take a stand for church/state separation
~Tammy~
Format: Paperback pp
Its a sketch for you.
I've lived in Las Vegas for a long time, since I was a toddler. This past January I had the opportunity to spend time downtown at the Neon Museum along the Fremont Street Experience where there are salvaged signs, restored and lit up all along the walkway. It's really quite beautiful, particularly at night. About a half mile down the road is the Neon Boneyard. I got to pay my first visit to the Boneyard just a few weeks ago, and fell in love with everything I saw. Literally, I was blown away. I talked with the gallery director at TastySpace and asked if I might include a few paintings of neon signage in the show, two smaller works I'd done from the lit signs on Fremont Street, and two larger works from the Boneyard. He was game, and so I churned out 'Jer' as well as another titled 'Nter' (which you'll see soon) and added them to the lineup.
In your life
EXCEPT FOR THE GOD-DAMNED BICYCLISTS.
There is a deeper problem here. Increased risk aversion may end up compromising the very foundations of the SENS programme. If we are to achieve de Grey’s goal of longevity escape velocity (LEV) then we need to launch an aggressive campaign of developing and testing medical interventions. But testing such interventions is a risky business. Who among the risk averse is likely to subject themselves to unproven techniques?
Another story: I was part of a havurah, a counter- cultural, progressive Jewish religious fellowship. I still remember the day on which I discovered by chance that an apartment block, where many of my friends who were members of the havurah lived, did not rent apartments to Blacks. It was such a shock. I naively thought that such a thing was impossible. In South Africa the racism was blatant, clear, public and ugly but here in America it was hidden with euphemisms and in code.
see you all soon
“I found it very hard to see what was written in my exercise books and on the blackboard. I had to sit in the front row so that I could see what the teacher was writing. I was feeling a little scared at the time. I knew that there was something wrong with me but I didn't want anyone to know. I was hoping it would just be a temporary thing and it would pass.
The fashion is totally inspiring too, nipped in waists, lace gloves, coiffed hair and lashings of lipstick, I am in heaven!
10:25 PM – And here comes The Miz to take on Brodus Clay. Really?! The Miz is not sure why he is tasked with taking on Brodus either. After all, he is the most must see WWE Superstar of all time. After a short, but still the biggest challenge Clay has faced since his debut, match the Funkasaurus gets the win.
After the nine-month mark, I had a respite from grief. I liked the symmetry of nine months of grief (gestation) before being born into a new life, but as happens with grief, the respite was merely that — a respite. A couple of weeks ago, the need to see my mate one more time grew so great it felt as if the yearning would explode from my body like the creature in Alien. The feeling came and went for a while, and now the creature has gone back into hibernation. But still, the yearning lingers.
In my view the State and its Agencies must perform in an exemplary fashion if we are to progress. A good example is worth a thousand words.
It could be very easy to criticize Zink’s motivations, hesitations, or lessons learned. He’s young, hopeful, and drawn by the call of the Spirit into relationships with the least, little, and lost. He has not yet developed the hard edge of cynicism of years of church service. He’s not yet overanxious about budgets, councils, and general conventions. He still believes change is possible.
Did you know that your subconscious mind simply doesn’t recognise negative instructions?
I'm compiling the data and will post reviews and pictures this week.
Day 31 – Rest Day! Thats today. Even though its a rest day, I did get up early and did 20 minutes of cardio. I need to start my day with something and make up for the half assed / lack of cardio I did when I was at my parents.
a project having to do with Easter. This super-fun
I don't need to change my comments to word verification (a real pain) or comments "to wait until I moderate them" (at least not yet) since Blogger is really doing a great job....
like i said, there was never a question.
There you go. Toddler busy bags on the cheap. Never ever get them out unless you are doing school. The rocks and shells were the kids favorite things. I eventually had to make them play with them on the kitchen floor because my vacuum hated them. But, they would ask for me to do school so they could play with them.
I'm turning 30 in less than two weeks. What would she say if she saw me now? My chosen industry is collapsing around me. My sister and sister in law are both pregnant. I don't even have a boyfriend. Would 20 year old me be upset? Would she worry that all the work she'd put in between then and now would be for nothing?
As a society, we could encourage this in a material way by acknowledging the value of parenting via Social Security and other benefits.
My entry for the living room will consist of around 20 photos. I think I might need to post a CD or USB! Here's a sneak peek of a few of them.
And, verily Our Word has gone forth of old for Our slaves, – Messengers, that they verily would be made triumphant. And that Our hosts, they verily would be victors (V.37:171173).
“But it’s my name! I can’t just stop using it!”
Jonah heads off for the saloon and gets into a poker game only to have Mayleen interrupt it with a note that states: Chako is innocent. I helped Chako escape. You brought him back. His blood is on your hands now. She runs out and Hex follows close behind.
Tired.....in fact exhausted.....
But the Buddhist tradition has used the word to mean uninvolved, unattached openness to the best for ‘all sentient forms’ without any thought of anything in return.
Federal Minister and Kota Marudu MP Maximum Ongkili is yet to keep his promise to 150 Dusun families who are again being victimised by the forestry department.
stormy sunday playlist (also known as "today on my ipod") - you can sleep while i drive (melissa etheridge), she loves you (the beatles), peaceful easy feeling (the eagles), your winter (sister hazel), dock of the bay (otis redding), bubble toes (jack johnson), all i want is you (u2), i'm yours (jason mraz), come away with me (norah jones)
It seems that sometimes the simplest of things are indeed the best :D
Each centimeter of the altarpiece was scrutinized and professionally photographed at extremely high resolution in both regular and infrared light. The photographs were then digitally “stitched” together to create highly detailed images which allow for study of the painting at unprecedented microscopic levels. The website itself contains 100 billion pixels.
"Do you think God makes accidents?" Mrs. O'Mara said.
In Israel, Yom HaZikaron begins in the evening marking a day of mourning and honoring the fallen, and ends the following evening, when Yom HaAtzmaut, Israel’s Independence Day begins. A small committee organized this event: Eran Rosenberg, Noam Even, Community Shaliach (Israeli Emissary) for the Jewish Federation, and Sigi Even.
81. Sculpt. Pick up some modeling clay and play with some simple sculpting.
In the morning it was still snowing in just the same way. Mummy had already got started with her work and was very cheerful. She didn't have to light fires or get meals ready and didn't have to be worried about anybody. I said nothing.
A Rough Shoot is easily one of the most breathlessly exciting books I've read this year. But by all accounts the final book I'll be blogging about in this run of Geoffrey Household posts – A Time to Kill, the direct sequel to A Rough Shoot (the only sequel, aside from the much later Rogue Justice, that Household wrote) – is just as exciting. And in the edition in which I'm showcasing it, it boasts a dustjacket designed by an artist and author I recently had the great pleasure to meet...
Writer Don Barnett, tells us more about the visit earlier this month by a high level entourage from Washington to his native Nashville. We told you about it here and here.
This Thanksgiving Sunday, GET STUFFED, then… GET DOWN TO GASTOWN!
mmmm...read more of the blogs. there's waaaaay more to it. I dont personally think ronnie's post is insulting in the way you suggest. Its point is to TRY to do the most possible...
Subsequently, I had green praying mantises.
it’s just the dress rehearsal rag,
Host Venkata Bhatta Dasa welcomed everyone, before turning proceedings over to his colleague Paul Raushenbush, who was officially moderating the event. Formerly a Dean at Princeton’s Office of Religious Life, and now moving on to become senior religion editor of the Huffington Post, Paul introduced the two speakers, and set the tone for the evening.
yo minna-san
Lime wedges, for serving
my energy plummets.
again, not a huge surprise, and I’m personally very happy to see her go. I was not a huge fan (understatement).
I know I have. I’ve been called a homophobe, an ignorant person, and a radical. It’s hurtful to be bashed and made fun of, but I understand it’s because I’m close to exposing the lie. I realize it’s “real” people who are on the receiving end of the truth I speak, and they are the ones who end up feeling like hot coals have seared their skin. But, most of them are so enslaved to the lie, their very lives depend upon it so they respond with viciousness.
But in the City, everything comes at a cost...
When I tried my organic Egyption cotton pads for the first time, I thought, “Wow! These are more comfortable than my underwear!” Okay, ha ha, not exactly– wearing a pad is wearing a pad–but they were sooooo soft. I have not worn a tampon in a year. I don’t plan to ever go back.
1 tsp. paprika
In the end I did 18 miles at an average pace around 10:15. I had hoped for under 10 minutes but also wanted to keep to an easy, sustainable pace. My average was really messed up by my first mile which was over 12 minutes. I am still puzzled by this. Typically my most sluggish, leaden first mile under poor conditions is not too much over 11 minutes. I don't know when I've last run a 12 minute mile (except on trails) without snow and ice on the ground. And on this day the conditions were great and my legs felt fine...more like a 10:30 warm-up pace. Mile 2 was in fact 10:30, and the rest were around 10 minutes, give or take. So that first mile really messed up the average. I don't know if it was the Garmin, or me.
La Trobe University took legal action against the vendor of the property over the 2004 sale. The uni claimed the developer had misled it over the state of the building.
the thing that was the most frustrating is that, even though i felt like at any moment, my ear drums would rupture and i would be deaf for the rest of my life, the crying didn't bother me. there was the small moment where i couldn't really think straight and found myself standing in front of the basil, getting exasperated because i couldn't find it. but the crying wasn't what sent me over the edge. it was the feeling i got when that woman cast her judgement at me with such reckless abandon, the feeling that i was a gnat. that i was no more than a mosquito. that i had no business being in her presence.
5/2 Day 69 W: Today was a very good day indeed! Last night was a change out, I even missed the big obvious wees because we all went to be extra late and had an extra hard time settling down. Just one of those things. One thing is for sure, the Moose will not settle to nurse if he’s soiled. It’s “change me or I’ll shred your nipple.” But once we got going we were on a catching roll. Lots of wees and I knew there was a ticking poo bomb in the boy. At around 11:30am the first poop he started a small amount in his diaper and I exclaimed, “EEK! WAIT!” and I guess he knew something was awry because he did indeed stop. I held him over our potty container and he hung out there relaxing for a few minutes as I waited. And boy…once he started it was crazy. The poop came out in three waves over the course of five minutes. Thick, yellow-orange, and copious. I mean really. It was crazy.
Since it's been 150 years since I last posted, I believe it's about time. I'll give a recap of what's been going on since the beginning of 2010.
Anyway, by this point I was on the verge of breaking- I felt so convicted of the decision that needed to be made but kept fighting it, not willing to fully submit and let God completely take over. Once I finally gave up, threw my hands in the air and prayed unwaveringly for a way out, God swooped me up so fast it’s no wonder I feel like that was a lifetime ago……
make something using an ingredient beginning with the magic letter – it can also be the name of the recipe or the type of bake. Sorry if that wasn’t clear and I’m glad Denise decided to send these in anyway!
People are lonely because they build walls instead of bridges. –Joseph Fort Newton
even when I succumb to death, my spirit never ceases;
Taryn Tyler
The internal difficulties which are dogging our party should not and cannot be allowed to affect our election chances for the Greater London Assembly here in London in 2012. It is imperative that we all start working towards this campaign now!
Some of the ruins you can walk up and some of them you can climb up. The ones you can climb you usually use the replacement steps the archaeologists put in to rebuild so you can see what they looked like, but sometimes you use wooden steps.
Sign up here for monthly tips and solutions for getting organized. Register now and receive “Purposeful Parenting” & “Simplified Life” tips as our gift to you.
David Bartizol/Soroka (4-6) (3-6)
In the meantime, author B. L. Fowler remains hopeful that this Mother’s Day will be one many moms will certainly remember, especially those who receives a copy of his new book.
Some Habits to Break:
Have a fun and action packed week-end! Mine looks to be just that with a concert tonight, a baseball game, my daughter's confirmation and a visit from G-Mama and G-Papa (grandparent names lovingly coined by my kids) tomorrow and a handful of other commitments! I'm tired, but happy already....!
Born into local high society, Kraft showed early promise in the fine arts. He began painting with watercolors at age 5. At the Plaza Art Fair he sold decorated matchboxes and oil portraits that were so accomplished that officials questioned whether their 13-year-old creator had made them.
I was created to love her only because of the vast and grace filled love that God showed me first.
Put water into a pot, making sure the spaetzle maker spans the diameter of the pot, bring the water to a boil, and lightly salt it.
LS2 lesson 4 & 5
In the actual world, in which everything is bound to and conditioned by everything else, to condemn and think away anything means to condemn and think away everything. The expression "that should not be," "that should not have been," is farcical-- If one thinks out the consequences, one would ruin the source of life if one wanted to abolish whatever was in some respect harmful or destructive. Physiology teaches us better!
He was also able to evoke real emotion from my face. :)
The similarly successful German national Otto Rehhagel led Greece to their greatest footballing success in 2004 when they lifted the European Championship in a surprise victory.
This space will be our new permanent home. The lease is set to be finalized later this week but we have possession of the space as of May 1st. We are doing some renovations and painting in the next couple weeks (Vancouverites, feel free to come and help us!), and we will move into the building later this month.
Lore of Athel Loren
We all know that a novel is about conflict. No one wants to read about people living happily ever after--that's why it isn't in the fairy tales.
Thanks for stopping by.......and Happy Memorial Day and as posted on Facebook :
Describe any concrete particular thing. You will describe it (you can only describe it) in terms of its properties. Concrete particulars, as Heraclitus pointed out, are constantly coming-to-be and passing away. Properties (forms, universals) are eternal. The epistemological challenge posed by Heraclitus’ doctrine of universal flux is met with the Platonic doctrine that formal knowledge (knowledge of formal properties), as distinct from material knowledge (knowledge of concrete particulars), constitutes true understanding.
Masthead The listing of the publication’s senior staff; sometimes all of them
Julia’s Birth Story
And so create global change.
Can’t you feel this Life?
People who like complete control over the customization of their phones, and want to be able to fiddle the lowest level functions, will prefer Android thanks to its greater openness (one downside of this, though, is that each company that makes Android phones can tweak them, sometimes replacing default Android apps with inferior tools developed by that company).
This was a wonderful pattern. It was beautifully charted and all instructions were very clear. Wendy included a stitch count after each major section finished. This shawl is designed to start from the bottom by casting on the highest number of stitches and decreases to the top. It was a very enjoyable knit!
Helpless among the living and the dead,
This isn’t even a culture specific thing. For sure, African kids, it doesn’t matter where you were born – they know of one family member or the other to dodge. The usual don’t let them touch your head mantra is dished prior to a trip to the homeland. Even asian kids, most of them know of some dodgy uncle or aunty they’re parents don’t want them anywhere of. Slowly but sure we isolate our children from family. Which is fair enough. If i had family like a colleague of mine who’s brother or something was in the news after being arrested for peadophilia, if i were her i’d be getting a restraining order that runs all year round especially Christmas!
Thirdly, and finally, once the oldco has a CVA in place, oldco and newco merge, so that oldco continues, thus returning all the assets to oldco and the long and proud history is not lost.
* Inquiries 10%
Deschutes Brewery Jubel 2010
In addition to a somewhat eccentric style of dress, the Fijians have various traditions and ceremonies including that surrounding the drinking of yangona (Kava), Fiji's national drink. There is a strict protocol associated with yaqona drinking, one should clap once, then, clasping the hands, take the cup, and drink the yaqona in a single draft before returning the cup to the bearer, and clapping a further three times.
We’ve all seen this in writing, one of those cautionary tales people warn you about. For those sitting in the cheap seats, I’ll break down what thesaurus rape is.
*Amazing ribs
But things didn’t go as smoothly as we’d hoped this morning. When we got to Rikers going through security and waiting for an escort took much longer than expected and unfortunately it really cut the time for the mock trials short. The mock trials were supposed to be held in the gymnasium, but because the religious services were being held there at the same time that wasn’t possible. The religious services are normally held in a separate chapel area, but because it’s under construction services must be held in the gym on Sunday mornings. That’s alright but there was a lack of communication sucked. So we had to have the mock trials take place in their living areas, where we have been conducting the sessions all semester. Today we brought 8 dozen boxes of donuts for the guys as a treat but we had issues getting that through since the Captain on shift this weekend would not allow it. He protested because apparently the donuts are considered contraband and he wouldn’t allow them to pass through since he was not aware of any clearance for them. Although we had clearance through the “higher-ups,” this seemed not to have been communicated to the appropriate people. So at first they confiscated the donuts which was so frustrating BUT we ended up getting them back. Only problem was, 2 dozen of the 8 dozen were not given back to us (ridiculous but unsurprising). And on top of that, the certificates for the guys were not printed out as they should have been (another lack of/miscommunication I guess). They’ll have to receive them another time. Long sigh.
March 30, 2012 – Weight: 136 / Size: 8
Ouroussoff suggested that part of that had to do with the expectations of an architect post-Bilbao. Gehry responded, "There's an expectation of what I do: 'This doesn't look like Bilbao; why are you doing this stuff that looks ordinary?' I've gotten some of that already."
The elders knew not the answer.
I saw parents yell at their children, be physically rough with them, ignore them, threaten them, and otherwise make choices that were appalling to me, all the more for the vividness with which I observed them.
“I lodged the report because I want to be a piece of the puzzle to recover the truth, and I need a record to claim my medical expenses,” Su said.
A beautifull life you will find
“RJ had made sure the premiere was filmed — and we all passionately believed that one day Robin would watch it.”
Seth had a special twinkle in his eye every time he told me the story of his and Garbo’s chance meeting, all because he wouldn’t give up on getting an exclusive. He said he even received a thank you note from the charming movie star, hoping that they would meet again someday. But they never did.
I wonder if anyone will be offended. I hope so.
If you like the genre – play it!
Add butter
And that, in a nutshell, is why I will not continue with research after I graduate college... because although I love science and all that it does for our world, and although I am not, per-se, against animal research (my feelings on it are incredibly mixed and it is one of those things I just prefer to not think about), I would be unable to separate my emotions from my research participants. I am an animal lover first and anything else second.
There’s no Pirates trailer up yet, but do we really need one? It’s going to be nearly three hours long, have approximately a dozen plot threads fighting for dominance, give Johnny Depp another opportunity to mince around like a deranged git, and I am going to bring a big bottle of rum to the theater and enjoy every damn minute of it.
When I hurt my foot last year, I joined a gym to be able to access exercise bikes and elliptical machines. I kept up with my membership this year thinking it would be good to have access to a treadmill as well. I did a treadmill workout today - and actually now love having this option even when I do not need the free childcare.
Without returning home, Ki Joon shows up to the office in his sweats and all the employees look so shocked you’d think he was in a grass skirt. We get to meet his aunt and they start doing that thing where the characters start filling us in on some back story even though normal people never talk like that. We do learn something and it’s that Ki Joon will be going on marriage dates.
he disappeared
Attempts at adopting socialist policies in the US were undermined by a Supreme Court whose constitutional role was to confine the power of the legislature and executive; but Canada was more amenable to socialism because of parliamentary supremacy and a general view of parliament as guarantor of the common good.
The Conlons
“My soul glorifies the Lord and my spirit rejoices in God my Savior, for he has been mindful of the humble state of his servant. From now on all generations will call me blessed, for the Mighty One has done great things for me Holy is his name…”
I hope you found my Do’s and Don’t useful, I’d love to know if you have any survival tips for our fellow assistants out there!
Personally I think these people ENJOY being miserable. Some people do! You'd have to really, if you know it's coming all year and you don't do anything about it.
Although it was sunny, it's always windy here, especially near the water, so I opted for long sleeves (also so that I wouldn't have to wear sunblock, ugh). I love this pretty silk blouse.
Migrant and seasonal farmworkers are some of the lowest wage earners overall. The National Agricultural Workers Survey found the average annual income for a farmworker falls right around $10,000. For farmworker women, those numbers are likely even more appalling. AFOP members are doing their part to help break that mold. For example, one of our members in New Mexico, HELP-NM, is training farmworker women for jobs in innovative employment sectors such as solar energy. They are also training women for better-paying positions traditionally held by men within agriculture, such as tractor operators.
and hustled back to the school about 6:45. They were still waiting. The celebration
The paperboy cycles away
Back into pot
As part of my parent/teacher conference, I scheduled an additional meeting with the music teacher.*
Not out of the house, we're here to stay for a while yet... but the Homeschool Den blog will be moving. A couple of months ago one of the editors of Parents contacted me and asked if I would like to come under the Parents umbrella as one of their bloggers. I was honored and thrilled to join such a great team of people. So in just a couple of weeks you'll find us over at the Parents website. We'll have a link from this site to get you to the right place. Stay tuned for more about that transition soon!
HOPE YOU ENJOY!!
Now since I don’t need a sofa I can’t even mention the idea of new sofa anywhere near the $1,000 range. I had given up hope until my friend & client Jules gave me the heads up on Sofa Craft.
The "Island" is still a place of "Whatever you wish for" can be! I love my world of imagination, exploration, and escapism, but I am also conscious enough to be open to the things that will enrich my life and my being, and LOST is one experience that I will have with me forever. I had so much fun with every aspect of this adventure. I loved being an active participant in the story.
All schools should develop policies to promote reading for enjoyment throughout the school.
You might or might not have noticed but I’m somewhat a Grammar Nazi (GN), I shriek at the sight of a misspelling in my posts and I have have to correct it ASAP, but sometimes I have this urge to punch in one or three more ‘!’ than necessary and to insert quite a few of those smiley expressions at one time just to show how much I enjoyed a post, for example: I didn’t just like but I loved loved those photos Daphne had posted of her trip in Malaysia, but the Grammar Nazi in me suppressed the impulse to over do it. Speaking from experience, while on the internet it is much harder to discern someone’s reaction to a post or a comment, oh they’d type it out for you plain and straight alright, but often there’s hardly any emotion, any vibes to be felt at all (unless they make it very clear). Exclamation marks (even a single one) and smiley faces sets this tone to what you’ve said, to me it says: Awesome, good stuff, dude!
So the seasons and the cycles and all the things that make us look forward in anticipation? I’m not feeling it. At least not today. That glorious tree seems like a personal affront.
Now, you'd think this would be the point in All Ladies Do It when Paolo freaks out. I mean, how would you react if someone you love told you that they almost had restroom-quality anal intercourse right under your nose with some creep in a red blazer? But he doesn't, freak out, that is. You see, the reason Paolo doesn't go ape shit over this revelation is because he thinks Diana is making up these salacious scenarios, like her washroom encounter with Alphonse, for the benefit of his fanciful penis. We all know this is not case, and continue to watch him get turned on by his wife's "wild fantasies."
Gonna strike all the big red words from my little black book
Another year another vehicular problem!! (third year methinks!)
The Mole Sisters are kidlit protagonists whom I recognize immediately (small square books, delicate and dusty illustrations, cute little moles), but have never read. So as a part of my books-about-girls crusade, I thought I should pick one up and see what I think.
High above on a hill, grains of light hit my face by the handfulls,
They said hey babe, take a walk on the wild side
Ballast Point actually started out as a homebrew shop in 1992, and only fours years later they installed major scale brewing equipment. The homebrew shop is still open, and they have opened another brewing location to try and keep up with thirsty consumers. I am pretty happy to finally have acquired a bottle this beer after a very long wait. Their last release was just a few weeks ago, and they only released 30 cases of this beer.
(Any, all, or none may apply; BHO = Obama, EC = Cantor, n = natal; NN = North Node, a point of encounters.)
I’ve lived fear
It’s been a great day over here at chasing mailboxes. First, yesterday’s post about Capital Bikeshare was featured on DCBlogs. Second, I learned that I have a collaborator on my rapidly unfolding cupcaking commuting research project.
I dream about it. That’s how I know what it really is. What it really wants. The children. The last couple had none, preferring work to family (and there is the most likely reason the cherub made them leave) but we have three under ten, young and healthy. I’ve told them to stay far away from the cherub. At first they asked why and at first I told them but my dreams – nightmares – transferred to them and I had to backtrack, to tell them I was just playing and that it wasn’t going to get them. They still don’t play near it though, and I’m glad about that.
3/4 pint milk.
Two caveats:
and camped out for the week. We climb mountains, white water raft, shop in
01-Flee-Rekkers - Lone Rider
An intelligent man is sometimes forced to be drunk to spend time with his fools.
Sam Towers was wonderful with children. He always found time for people, young, old and in between. He was not a traveller. As the priest said ‘he liked to be where he belonged’ among his family.
At the lake, we soaked in the sun, while Khmers swam (fully clothed, of course).
If you crack open the casing of the new iPhone, you will find significant upgrades from the iPhone 4. The new iPhone features Apple’s dual-core A5 processor like the iPad 2 for even faster performance, better gaming, and drastically improved graphics. Apple didn’t stop there though. Unlike the iPad 2, the new iPhone packs 1GB of RAM, according to a source familiar with the SOC’s manufacturing. That not only means better web browsing, but more importantly, new background tasks that Apple will introduce in the new iPhone’s software will perform much better.
How to make the biscuits:
Waiting for him to get home so I can fall asleep, knowing he’s okay.
Flair calls Garrett a disrespectful disgrace, and he has 2 Hall of Fame rings, so Garrett is a punk. And AJ is in the ring with a punk, so he is associating himself with a punk. He is holding a tribute for Eric Bischoff next week, and they are not invited to it. Wooooooo!!!
Rev. Clark said the covenant has thus been analyzed:
Senses
TERROR.
My family has moved a fair amount in my life and one thing that we had always found are loving, caring, supportive neighbors. For the 13 years that we lived in San Antonio we had neighbors like none other.
The date for this 15kg loss has pushed back to his birthday, late June, on the not unreasonable grounds that too rapid a weight-loss might reflect an unsustainable period of deprivation and starvation that would quickly end and the weight would yo-yo back up, and even higher.
For the birds, there's really minimal prep other than the dry rub. Pull out the giblets, rinse em off in cool water, pat them dry with a towel (the chickens, I don't care what you do with the giblets). The only extra step I recommend before applying the rub is to peel a bunch of cloves of garlic, and insert them under the skin of the bird over all the best pieces of meat. I put a couple over each breast, as well as some in the thigh and drum areas. Once the chickens are looking nice and lumpy, apply a nice thin coating of peanut oil all over the inside and outside of the chicken. It will give it a delicious golden skin, and it lets the dry rub stick. Now that you've greased up your bird, you're going to want to apply the rub. Don't roll the chickens in it. It will be way too much. Apply a bit here and there and just rub it in, making sure not to miss any nooks or crannies. Do the inside surfaces of the bird too, if for no other reason, then because it's fun to wear your food like a puppet once in a while. After this step, wrap the chicken(s) in saran wrap or tightly seal in a ziplock with the air pushed out. Refrigerate for at least an hour or two to get the flavor to penetrate.
For frying, my first option is peanut oil, next would be canola.
You will not understand the power and the beauty of your youth until they have faded. But trust me, in twenty years, you will look back at photos of yourself and recall in a way you cant grasp now how much possibility lay before you and how fabulous you really looked. You are not as fat as you imagine
HE’S TERRIFIED
All the blogs linked to in the post are liked enough by me to:
Some impressions are easy to shed while others are hopelessly tangled. Back in the Air Force I bought my first used car, and all the men in the shop immediately wanted to come out and look at it, even though it was cold outside. I understood this was something men did, and still see groups of guys in parking lots, standing around, gazing at cars. That one is easy. I never got it, and still don’t, so I just no longer pretend.
Obviously, women have made progress in many western - or northern - or developed - (pick your term of choice) countries. For a time - and this is the point that people like Wente (and Palin and numerous other highly public anti-feminists) seem to have gotten stuck on - it even looked as though the war had indeed been won, or nearly so.
Only 900 bottles of this beer were filled, so it will surely be
The earth needs our prayers more than we know. It needs us to acknowledge its sacred nature, that it is not just something to use and dispose. Many of us know the effectiveness of prayers for others, how healing and help is given, even in the most unexpected ways. There are many ways to pray for the earth. It can be helpful first to acknowledge that it is not “unfeeling matter” but a living being that has given us life. And then we can sense its suffering: the physical suffering we see in the dying species and polluted waters, the deeper suffering of our collective disregard for its sacred nature. Would we like to be treated just as a physical object to be used and abused? Would we like our sacred nature, our soul, to be denied?
Because I still have the November Turkey/NaNo hangover, this post will be short and sweet. And most likely include bullet points. Because I like them (those cute little black circles).
3 I'm Ready for You 4:24
Dogfish Head / Three Floyds- Poppa Skull- a deep, golden ale spiced with cardamom and fermented using a robust Belgian yeast strain. One third of the volume was then aged for 6 months in oak brandy barrels. Spice, esters, and sweet brandy dominate the aroma. A robust 10% abv is rounded by caramel and vanilla notes from the wood with a slight spiciness coming from the yeast.
However, I love the element of surprise, and I am not a particularly fussy person, so it has been a great way for me to experiment with new flavours and products that I may not of known about or chosen otherwise. This being said, you can ‘rate’ all the products online, and choose things you love and would like regularly, and things you never want (eg if you are allergic to nuts) so there is some logic in that respect.
mjeah you’re right he is a prisoner, A prisoner without justice, A prisoner wherein he was convicted of the crime he never did. He was there to stay and suffer inside that confined place, without love and understanding from the world outside.
He wanders Up for water/
The wilderness was punctuated now and again by memorials of former years, some of them looking all the grimmer and blacker for lingering on out of context. (p. 156)
The Great Gig In The Sky - Kirsty Rock (Pink Floyd)
I really thought I was going to die. The only thing that helped was some anti diarrhea stuff. I also ate a spoonful of clay stuff.
I will only use "will" power in the future, because apparently I have a congenital won't disorder.
By the way I love this snood!
Jack scratched his head. "Where are these plates now?"
A couple hours after Daniel's announcement - now the middle of the night - Matthew came downstairs and said he was going to throw up, too. And then he did. (Pause here being thankful that all my kids are old enough to make it to the toilet! Oh, it's so hard when they are little.) Matthew definitely had it worse than Daniel and he missed the last two days of school before Christmas break. The pukes part was about 12 hours, the feeling lousy another 12 - 24.
Glory in a Camel's Eye ~ by Jeffrey Tayler (Morocco)
Welcome Grace Kelly and Jane Birkin. The two people who inspired my “dream-y” bags.
The reporter tried to talk the naked, mentally disturbed man. But he replied using a vulgar language. He was also mumbling something which sounded religious and making gestures which looked like he was worshiping some gods. The villagers though he had gone mad.
Jade's life changes forever when Demetrius, a man she thought she'd made up, crashes into her life. While Demetrius looks like the man from her imagination, he isn’t exactly the man of her dreams. From the moment they meet, Jade’s life quickly begins to resemble a nightmare as she learns not only do vampires exist, but they're after her and her story. Jade and Demetrius are constantly at odds with each other. Demetrius is a powerful vampire who demands to know the source of Jade’s story, but Jade is strong and refuses to be intimidated by Demetrius. I loved how she more than held her own in their heated arguments. Even though Jade and Demetrius fight, they have amazing chemistry on a physical as well as emotional level. As the bond between them grows, Jade can’t help but wonder if Demetrius truly cares for her, or if he simply wants to know the source of her story.
Gold, silver and bronze medals are awarded for beers in 83 different style categories plus a separate pro-am competition.
Robin memorized her first poem this week and recited it in front of all her friend at our American Girl Club Caterpiller by Christina G. Rosetti. Falcon just started working on memorizing his 4th poem of the school year O Captian! My Captian! Falcon has been working through a new Science book which is time consuming on my part because It does not have an answer key so I need to look up the answers myself as well. Most of it is a good review from biology in college but I still need to look up answers to be sure we are both right.
Spooner told The Atlanta Journal-Constitution that Sherrod was not being treated fairly. “I said, ‘That ain’t right. They have not treated her right,’ “she told the newspaper.
Similar words came Friday from Germany’s Defence Ministry, which is hosting Macedonian Defence Minister Fatmir Besimi.
The nose is beautiful - can I use that adjective?͵ it deserves it!!! Both myself and Karl on the scooter agree on Vanilla essence͵ banana͵ bubblegum and malt.
Each fridge is so unbelievably tidy and spilling over with fresh organic produce and designer water.
The same becomes true of knowing and understanding the meaning of God’s various other names. God (Elohim) is the Lord, Yahweh — “I AM.” The Self-Existing One. This name of God describes Who He is, and discovering who the Almighty is will call us — even move us — to worship Him!
NO CAN BEATO THIS TAQUITO
I'm sick to death of standing in line behind some curry-breathed Indian from Calcutta or New Delhi or wherever who's returning endless baskets of merchandise to the neighborhood Walgreens because they're running an Indian coupon fraud scheme. I'm tired of the Indians and Asians coming to our country and immediately signing up for Medicaid and food stamps--even as they're taking on a $55K/year job.
Isn’t it evocative and foreboding? The story of young Henning and his family also tells the story of the growth of Stockholm. This is the first book in a series of five books that follow the family from 186o until 1968. This first book covers the period from 1860 until 1880 and is very much the story of the horrors of the industrial revolution. How the poor were used. And how this impacts on the individual. Young Henning has no family and at first no friends. He also has no education and no contacts. This means that he ends up with the hardest jobs there are. However the book also shows the love and friendship that grows even in the at first bleak life of the rented bed and work in the harbour. Somehow it is incredibly beautiful. And the end makes me cry every time.
what'a an ordinary day for you like?
Thanks for looking...have a wonderful day :)
1. thinly slice 3-4 large onions into long strips by cutting off ends, slicing in half, then shaving slices “across the grain” for long skinny strips… does that make sense even?
Because I am at a loss for words after tonight’s double overtime loss to the Washington Capitals, I am not going to write a post-game recap. Instead, I am going to let my Facebook status updates do the talking for what was a highly entertaining and intense game, despite a heartbreaking loss by the New York Rangers. I would also like to note, that the Rangers are once again partially done in by the referees, and both in the same situation. In Game One, a failed whistle with a puck in the crease resulted in a late-game tying goal to send the game to overtime 1-1. Tonight, in the third period, Henrik Lundqvist had the puck covered along the goal line, and even though the referee was right behind the net, he did not blow the whistle. The Capitals would score their first goal, to get the score to 3-1, before their onslaught would continue, all triggered by one goal.
in an instant world
My doctor put me on vicodin and flomax which expands the flow of your urine to match a firehose, the volume scared the heck out of me I thought something was broken.
Taking stock
While we did not get the Council to change its mind, I think the victory we achieved by empowering our seniors is better than any dollars we could have received. This was a proud day for Senior Community Centers – we have firmly cemented ourselves as the voice for seniors in San Diego.
Two small words that I love and hate at the same time. lol.
I figured it out last Wednesday. Not everything of course. Just the key for me. The key that I need to move on.
On any other day — say Monday or Tuesday or Thursday – I’d be grateful for the heads up. Glad that some kind soul had removed the burden of decision making from my shoulders. I’d rush to the kitchen, throw frozen breasts on the counter and start Googling, ‘Yummiest Yard Bird EVER.’ But today, the suggestion just irritates the 10th Circle of Hell right out of me and I stalk towards the family room fully prepared to deliver the “this is not a full service hotel and I am not your chief chef and chamber maid” mantra. Take cover, kids, Mean Mama is emerging from the closet.
Now there were staying in Jerusalem God-fearing Jews from every nation under heaven.
What is news though is that a couple of months back a young Country singer named Jacqui Ryan recorded her music video in my store. She is a lovely, talented girl and we were so delighted that they decided that Lily G was the perfect location for her video..If you ever wanted to see my store Lily G up close and personal and listen to a beautiful song at the same time go here .
I have just completed the online profile, please click on the link to have a look and find out a bit more about the Fair- http://www.countrylivingfair.com/spring/page.cfm/Action=Exhib/ExhibID=637
There are people who call themselves serious contenders for the office of President of the United States, and seem to think nothing of condemning lives they obviously don't understand. They claim to stand for the ideals of a country founded on the principles of life and liberty written into the U.S. Constitution. It is a poor joke to claim one stands for individual freedom while ostracizing and attempting to legally exclude whole groups of people from the benefits and protections of the law. It is abhorrent to use hate and ignorance to tell anyone, not just Americans, you don't deserve to be treated as an equal human being because you are a lesbian, gay, bisexual or transgender person.
The dress is from Forever 21, the bangles are from the States, and the necklace is from Quiapo. I always make sure to mix up my wardrobe with slightly expensive items and affordable ones as well. Siyempre no, girls on a budget like us can't always afford to dress up in designer duds from head-to-foot, it's not exactly practical. Besides, if you have the confidence to pull the look off, who can tell if your accessories came from thrift stores or only cost 80 pesos, right? It's all about the attitude, darlings!
I am going to take
Of course, like every other social matter this has a flipside to it. It would be so much more convenient to stalk someone and sit right next to her on a pacific flight. Then there is the human factor, the nice personalities, fancy titles and more socially appealing people will be picked and there is going to be someone, inevitably, to be left out, stuck sitting in far ends next to irrelevant personalities. But there is no way to avoid the unavoidable, there are people travelling around, which a person would not want to be caught dead with. It’s better to pick up and book early.
The next day we made our way to Breakthrough Urban Ministries. Breakthrough is in East Garfield Park Area of Chicago. They have a food pantry for the community, a preschool and various after school and weekend activities for kids and families. They have a Day Center during the week for people to come in off the streets and get a meal and other services. Breakthrough also has a place for people to come and stay. They typical stay for 6-8 months and Breakthrough helps them work on their job skills, schooling, locating a job and getting back on their feet. They also have the men and ladies take part in a weekly Bible Study. There are so many services that they provide, it's amazing!
Once the morning began in earnest, it was gone in an instant, and we all managed to arrive at our picnic location in one piece with little fuss and bother. I cannot say I am too innocent in regards to fuss and bother; I of course, had a moment of nothing being fit to wear in my entire wardrobe. Is that not always the way with us as women?
In fact there are three venomous snakes here, all to be treated with respect, which of course goes for everything you happen to see.
And then of course we had to order desert. Another giant list stared us in the face, this time involving fruits, ice creams, salted caramels and other sauces, and nuts. It took a while, longer this time than for dinner since we had to make a joint decision, but in the end settled on another option from the specials menu, and are very glad we did. Ours had chestnut “cream” – some sort of smooth chestnut sauce – and chestnut ice cream, and regular whipped cream.
But the end result of the Slippery slope is also impossible to predict in a linear fashion with any degree of accuracy, unless of course you have an army of lawyers, psychologists, psychiatrists, sociologists, and behavioral scientists all in relatively influential positions within state and federal government manipulating the next step on the slope, and all pushing the same propaganda out to a highly susceptible public that has been conditioned to rely on that “expert” opinion and forgo even minimal debate on the merits of the changes to be enacted.
Cut the Halloumi in to thin slices (less than 1/2 cm) then cut them into triangles (See photo above). Cut the triangles with the natural break of the Halloumi. Put the buttermilk or yoghurt/milk mixture in to a dish (I used an empty1 litre ice cream tub) and submerge the Halloumi in the liquid to soak, overnight or, for several hours in the fridge.
117. Deep breaths that calm and relax.
This one is all you guys! So a giant virtual hug and smooch to you for suggesting a Home Maintenance checklist be added to the Household Binder. Where was I on that one? It seems to clearly obvious and necessary now but it wasn't on my original list.... It's true that I have never claimed to be the brightest bulb...
How is the beer? 69 IPA’s deep, resiny harshness makes it an acquired taste, but I think I want to acquire it. Star of the show, though, was Tempest’s Into The Light, a pale ’n’ hoppy full of citrus flavours. Magic Rock’s Rapture was one of those hoppy red beers that I don’t normally like, but is well made.
dripping down butter and
You are today where your thoughts have brought you. You will be tomorrow where your thoughts take you.
The ship was huge!
Showdown is a cooperative learning activity in which students work first alone, and then with a team, to solve problems or answer questions on task cards. Easter Egg Showdown is a variation in which the task cards are tucked inside plastic Easter eggs. Students select an egg, open it, read the problem or task, and everyone on the team writes a response. In the final step, team members compare and discuss their answers. In the example above, the task cards contain sentences, and students have to identify the subject and the predicate of each sentence.
St. Lucia is a beautiful island and if you get the chance to visit I encourage you to do so.
First meetings must have first impressions. Do not expect “done deals” during a first visit. The initial visit, as we have seen above, is used to establish trust, and more than one call may be needed to create a framework for further discussions. Take your time.
In hindsight, I had a great time in Philly and a great time running this marathon. Again, the training was the true test though as it was way more difficult than the race itself. Training for a marathon is the true test.
are more likely to find an ice cube tray color that will fit into that color
Liberals, conservatives, Green Party members and political agnostics all voiced the same belief: Washington doesn’t work, and reporters who cover it don’t understand America.
Place the log on a cutting board. Using a serrated knife, cut the log on a diagonal into 1/2- to 3/4-inch thick slices. Arrange the biscotti cut side down on the baking sheet. Bake the biscotti until they are pale golden, about 20 minutes. Transfer the biscotti to a rack and cool completely.
Generally, when I need to find something out, the first place I go is Google or Wikipedia, like most people today. It’s not always what you need, but for some little piece of information, it really can’t be beat. What are the ranks of the NYPD? How does New York get its water? This stuff used to mean a trip to the library where the book you needed wasn’t always there, or a phone call to a professional. It was research.
The president said he recognizes that many Americans are tired of war and speaking for myself only, he’s right.
You should have a guest worker program, probably run by American Express, Visa or MasterCard so they minimize fraud, which the federal government won’t do. And you should have much stronger employer penalties at that point because you can validate it. I actually agree that self-deportation will occur if you’re single. If you’ve only been here a short time. And there are millions of people who faced with that, would go back home, file for a guest worker program and might or might not come back.
We love you, Ryan, it's so much fun to see you grow.
There are three kinds of sick:
It's release day! So that means it's time for a blog hop!!!
Moreover Matt! We are not trusting your anonymous commanders any more. I hope you remember how Judith Miller played her role to convince both US Public and its politicians about Iraq WMD program. At the end it was all lies. So we will not let you do the same with our country. I can assure you one thing, if it was not for ISI and Pakistan military, you would have to run for your safety in the same manner as you did in Mogadishu. Just to remind you of it, read below few lines
Traci Huskamp My passion for mixed media and collage fuels the fires of my creative spirit, and continues to lead me on a wondrous journey of artistic and self-discovery. Always striving for the perfect balance and integration of elements and processes in every piece, I enjoy making art that is thoughtful, intricate, and beautiful.
The Captain and Tenille. I wouldn't trust him to steer a boat.
- follow eternal verities
Assurance
And when the snow falls you're found in St. Moritz
Ceilings Below - Ceilings Below (After Hours 1986)
Nothing stays the same. Have I mentioned how very much I love the little grove by the church? Well, they cut down most of the trees. They only left the ones around the perimeter, but essentially, the grove is no longer. It's just an empty lot full of tree stumps. They took down the tire swing my son and his friend strung up with an old garden hose; in fact the tree it was hanging from is gone. I'm welling up with tears as I write this, as I did when I first saw it.
What is A Normal Blood Pressure Level?
(normally I don’t post other peoples stuff but this song always reminds me of Kara, because it’s how I feel, cheers)
Your score is the number of GTOH completed in the remaining time following 10 rounds of Cindy.
One would be wrong.
I had no guilt when I began dating. This is the physical world that I am in. Two and a half years after his passing, I moved from Connecticut to South Carolina to start a new life. I've been down here for 4 years now. It's been a rocky road for me but I feel Rich's love and I know I am capable of surviving on my own. He's with me every single
Lee Bradner Model 40 Production Thread Milling Installation and Service Manual
You guys are my everything. I'm the person I am today because every single one of you have been a part of my life. You have supported Brad and I since day one physically, emotionally and in the case of the wedding - financially. I'm so blessed to have such incredible people in my life, and my day is going to be that much greater because every. single. one. of you are in it.
I started with panic. Lots and lots of panic. I wasn’t equipped for this. I, frankly and selfishly, did not WANT to go GF/CF with L.’s diet. Not even for “just” six weeks. Not for a WEEK, for Pete’s sake.
If the anomaly persists, despite all attempts to explain it, then maybe the fundamental assumptions of the prevailing worldview need to be questioned. This is what Copernicus did when confronted with the perplexing motion of the planets. He challenged the geocentric worldview, showing that if the sun, not the earth, was at the center, then the movements of the planets began to make sense. But people don’t easily let go of cherished assumptions. Even when, 70 years later, the discoveries of Galileo and Kepler confirmed Copernicus’s proposal, the establishment was loath to accept the new model. Only when Newton formulated his laws of motion, providing a mathematical explanation of the planets’ paths, did the new paradigm start gaining wider acceptance.
I ask you…who doesn’t love opening a present when you wake up…twelve days in a row!
Experience Hendrix, LLC sues Capitol Records and the Beastie Boys for using various Hendrix samples on the song “Jimmy James” from the Check Your Head album. Though Jimi himself claims to have nothing to do with the lawsuit he takes a hard beating from the music press and fans.
The line that carries the beer from the "cellar" to the tap contains an appreciable amount of beer For 3/8in tube it's something like 30mL per metre, I think. (while we're mixing imperial and SI units, that's about 10mL each foot of 6.3mm ID line. More in the wider stuff traditionally used for cask) There's various devices along the way that also hold a bit (chillers, fob detectors, pumps, etc). Typically, this volume would be lost when line-cleaning is undertaken, i.e. as water or cleaning solutions displace it from the system.
once I heard about this, I felt so strange like... 'if I speak to Samurai.... ??? ' ummmmm I cannot imagine ... LOL
My spirit floats to be a part
I guess I just may have too much time on my hands. (Normal idiom)
The inspiration for this post is my own emotions leading to inaction. I was pretty confident that I had validated a B2B idea and was ready to ‘start building,’ and only 2 weeks before Christmas, I found myself back at square one. And sure, I’d be a hypocrite if I didn’t pick myself back up again (given that I preached this in an earlier post). However, given that I am thousands of miles away from my friends and family and have recently increased my burn rate by ~300%, it is no surprise that I am scared, frustrated, and a little discouraged. So much so, that I have been stuck in ‘quicksand’ for several weeks now, taking very little (if any) action.
This is what I mean when I say we all need to “agree to disagree” on all these issues and put Christ as the Head of the Body.
I did my first XC ski outing of the year on Sunday. I stopped by Torstein's house and we went up to Skistua outside of Trondheim. There is just barely enough snow to ski on, so I'm glad I have cheap skis. It looked like they had groomed the trail at least once, but there were quite a few spots where the dirt was sort of sneaking through into the snow, and the downhills were basically a big sheet of ice as soon as everyone had snowplowed all the loose stuff off to the side. I did well for the first time out, at least for the first trip to the food cabin. After we got back to the car I realized I had left my little belt pack at the cabin. So Torstein said "well, looks like we're not done skiing yet". So we skied all the way back to the cabin a 2nd time and got my bag back. By the time we got back the 2nd time it was getting dark and I was getting a bit tired. OK, really tired. My little stick arms aren't used to pushing on ski poles for 3 hours yet. My legs felt fine though so after I got back home I went to the gym and ran on the treadmill. Then I was actually really really tired....
1 succinct
Soundscape 4'57
How long has it been since you were taken from me?
I absolutely love this stamp - it was another result of my birthday spree! But I have had my eye on it for a while .. The papers are Gabrielle by Bo Bunny and the doily die is Sophia's heart by Cheery Lynn. Core'dinations is used for the matts and the card is finished off with pearl gems, WOC flowers and a tonic punched butterfly. I also blended some Pool Adirondack around the edges of the image. The sentiment was free with my new personalised stamp for the back of my cards from Stamping All Day. So impressed with the service I got here .. I would highly recommend it for your personalised stamps!
Bloomingdales is celebrating Asian Pacific Heritage Month so a representative of Hanae Mori Parfum contacted me to see if I'd be interested in coming out to teach how to fold origami cranes to shoppers in Palo Alto.
The Beginner
The fact that an ingenious, post-punk Boston act from the early '80s happened to arrive immediately on the heels of a far more seminal post-punk band from the same town, who by the way had just waved their collective white flag, strikes me as too much of a coincidence, but in the case of Three Hands, I have a feeling it was merely that and nothing deliberate. Though similarities to Mission of Burma emanate from both sides of this ace 45, I don't believe this unheralded trio had any intention of usurping the throne belonging to Roger Miller and Co. However modest or ambitious Three Hands' aspirations were is entirely irrelevant at this point, and hardly factor into Mark Kopenits ringing, clangy fretboard maneuvers that gracefully tumble down like a waterfall of minor-chord arpeggios, imbuing "Climb" with so much of it's texture and panache. "Big Person" places more emphasis on choppy rhythms than melodic riffs, and as such acts as a fitting counterpart to the aforementioned "Climb." According to a post on New Wave Outpost, this wasn't Three Hands only single, and on a sadder note, Kopenits passed away in 2009.
Cricut Cartridge: Sweet Treats, Storybook
The Creme Brie L’Extra on Agropur’s website describes this product as being based on “Crème Brie L’Extra, Canada’s best selling brie”. Hmm “Canada’s best selling Brie”? … I guess I better try some regular Crème Brie L’Extra soon.
10- European Incoherent Scatter Scientific Association EISCAT Ramfjordmoen, Near Tromsø, Norway
Totals:
The GOP has become an insurgent outlier in American politics. It is ideologically extreme; scornful of compromise; unmoved by conventional understanding of facts, evidence and science; and dismissive of the legitimacy of its political opposition.
It’s often said that most ministers really only have one sermon that they keep repeating in different forms. I think I have at least a couple. And one of them is that we need to strive to retrain ourselves away from either/or thinking so that we can embrace the world as it is, which is both/and. We are called to save the world and to savor it – both. Life is full of sorrow and of joy – both. The glass is half full and it's half empty – both.
i love that she is using her blog for good and to serve others.
